
--------------------------------------------------------
bad camera  -138
front camera  awesome
Images were sharp and clear from front camera.
front camera is average  
and those who say that the quality of the rear camera is bad.
but back camera Quality is not that much good .
2 rear camera is just decent you cant expect much in this budget
Camera quality is too good.
poor camera quality.
I am little bit sad with quality of the primary camera  which is not so good despite having 13 MP camera.
Front camera is better than the back camera
Camera is not that good in low lighting condition I felt it bit noisey  bit still you can t ask for more when you re paying just a 10k.
Camera is poor  sound quality also very slow.
camera quality is decent front facing camera was superb.
The camera quality is almost same as an SLR camera with DSLT effect.
Camera not good in deem light but also in artificial light.
camera is too good.
But the Camera is not good very noisy in low light.
Would have given 5 out of 5 if  front camera would have been working in low light also.
Day vision camera good not excellant  As per advertisement 
 Classic phone with great design performance is not up to mark but it is very good camera is also good 
the camera provided is good but not best.
 Already used that product for last 2 months  does not faced any problem till now though i used this set for lots of files download or playing some high end game battery back up really nice  camera quality is awesome  only problem i face is that there should be a volume button outside to be used during any music playing  otherwise for general user it s a very useful under 10K bucks.
Conclusion  If you want a phone that looks good and has good camera this phone is not for you.
In night the camera quality is not so good.
2 5  Very poor rear camera.
front camera is good.
But i little bit disappoint With front camera.
A very good13 mp rear   5 mp sefie camera produces sharp and clear pics with good detailing the best camera within the 10k range and even better than samsung e6 redmi lenovo.
Rear Camera  6 10    I really disappointed with this camera.
 Nice display design is very good but camera is not too good.
As said in the advertisements  the camera quality is not great.
Camera is good not the best.
Rear camera is not like 13MP.
front camera excellent  rear need some improvement.
phone camera little low other wise very good mobile no hang the phone 
Good performance  battery is very good  camera is average  but in the price range we can t expect more.
Okay  so i was going through the review about the camera quality not being that good  Dude what else you want in 10k handset  Trust me guys camera is hell good.
Camera is decent but not very good for indoor photos.
As per 13 megapixel and 5 megapixels camera not good.
If camera quality is important then not recommended.
For me Camera is good as i do not expect it to give me DSLR  I am learning photography with DSLR  like quality.
front camera is great  
Picture quality  processer  camera   other features are excellent.
Good camera rear and front  Rear volume button comes handy for taking selfies too 
up is good not too good 1fault is that there is front camera no video mode is available.
Camera Performance Screen quality is too too too good.
looks nice  battery backup is average  camera is good but not best.
also the camera is too good   those who want DSLR like quality plz buy the camera not the phone .
Rear Camera is good  but not that good what i was expecting  as it is a strong point for Asus Zenfone 2.
on using 2 months the camera is good front is not bad the battery back up is cool better than intel os.
 Nice phone good battery and clear display but camera is poor built quality fine 
Talking about camera and the auto laser focus  it does what its meant to or build for  focuses an object under a second  and with 13MP cam with Manual mode output of picture quality is great  although I was disappointed that Asus did not provided panosphere mode in camera as this device has gyro.
The rear camera quality is not good like 13MP.
The camera quality is great but in night time its not that great but u will get decent quality pics no worries about that.
Rear Camera is not as good as front camera.
 worst camera quality don t buy this product.
Camera is too good after the software updates  
1. good camera both  some people commenting camera is bad for them guys take photo in manual mode u will get awesome quality and super resolution mode it gives more detailing after zooming the photo 
Camera quality is not good compared to peers like Mi4 Moto G etc.
The 5mp front camera is wide and sharp.
1. good quality back and front camera 
2  A very good 13 mp rear   5 mp selfie camera produces sharp and clear pics.
Selfie is to good from front camera.
camera quality is ok. but not so good .
Camera quality is not as effective as should have been for a 13 back  5 front camera.
I still don t like front camera as front camera works great only in good light.
what i dont like in this mobile  rear camera not so good 
The camera was very bad but when i updated my phone the quality of camera became superb.
camera quality almost same for all asus phone 
camera quality is very poor 
5 Camera is pretty decent especially the front camera.
quality of camera is too good.
Yesterday  all of sudden front camera stopped working.
 firstly i like to buy k3 note but due to out of stock from many days i ordered this phone and now i am so happy by using this product without any problem and far better than k3 note no heating issue good display good ram very good battery performance good camera quality smooth touch and zero lag.
 Good phone with super long battery life  but not that good camera.
front camera for selfie is excellent and rear camera is better than lenovo k3 and mi4i at this budget and many features are given with caera application that other phones dont have.
But this time the camera quality is very poor  though there are no other problem.
Don t get me wrong  the camera is good for the price range under 10   can compete against competitors like Yurekas and k3 notes but it just doesn t punch out in this category like it does in battery  feel  build  display smoothness  software  less heating issues etc.
Great processor and front camera and back camera Gorilla 4 glass finish.
good quality  looking good  but camera quality is not my expect range.
camera not good  as compared to ASUS s one and most important It s not stable at all.
Cons Mentioned  Front facing camera is not able to take Videos 
camera is very appreciative both front n back.
Overall a good and above average mobile when compared to other phones but only camera is little bit disappointing.
2  Rear camera quality not good
Its camera is average not too good like 13mp.
Performance is impressive   good battery life with average camera quality.
1 front camera is excellent you can also use beautification mode for better experience
 the mobile is nice compared to 10k range and camera quality is also good   better than k3 note and other fones  if u like it thn go for it but before buying go for full review in youtube 
 front camera very very poor.
Camera is decent although is not what i ve expect from a 13 Mp with pixelmaster but it capture good photo in the daylight  there is alot of features   option in the camera like panorama shoot  low light  manual  etc.
but front camera is really nice.
Camera quality reduced both front front   back.
display quality is superb also 13MP primary camera feels you nothing less than having a digital cam.awesome camera  258
Nice and fast delivery packing was nice and good it phone is nice it working good no heating problem camera is nice in this price   
0 MP and 13MP rear camera  beautiful pics.
Good camera.
 big screen  very good camera  awesome battery.
the primary camera good for look when u zoom it brokes  
All features in this Mobile is very good and having Lazer on the back with 13MP camera it is super It can easily Satisfied Costomer no problem is there in This Mobile.
Hi iam using fast 10 days it s working good and camera is good 
The ASUS UI is beyond bounds and camera quality is just awesome.
Camera quality is very excellent.
Camera quality is good 
Valur for money  the camera is excellent for outdoors  good for indoors 
Front camera is okay 3 5.
Camera quality is good.
1  13mp laser auto focus provides very good quality images along with the front facing 5mp camera
Good front camera  no hang  overall its so good.
good camera quality with nice features .
Camera is very nice.
3  Excellent Camera quality.
But the touch  speed  battery backup  camera are pretty good.
But surprisingly the front camera is good and performs better than expected.
1  camera is good  and video recording is excellent
Camera quality is really good.
Both front and back Camera quality is very good.
Picture taken from Front camera is good but detailing are missing.
Music and Sound Quality is very good and having the volume rocker behind the camera is nice 
of this phone is good and camera is very good.
front and back camera quality is very good 
The camera performance is simply super and the sound quality is also good.
Camera is good and with loots of features.
5 Very good camera quality front Facing is also good for selfies.
Pros Light in weight  build quality good Camera picture quality good  no heating issues.
Camera is poor  sound quality also very slow.
But again laser auto focus gives camera good marks as it works well when taking short distance shots.
camera quality is decent front facing camera was superb.
very good quality camera.
I purchased this phone from Flipkart last month it is really worth for money  Camera quality is awesome and the speed is also while playing games.
Good camera fitures
The rear camera 8 10  is excellent.
The laser itself has very good camera quality.
Front camera is good   rear camera ok. Good battery back up.
THE CAMERA QUALITY IS VERY GOOD DUE TO LASER SYSTEM   IS ONE OF THE BEST SMARTPHONE AMONG THIS PRICE RATING.
found it very good  good camera  good internal memory  otg support  easy interfaces  
 Awesome phone camera quality is very nice using from past 5 months 
Camera is good.
front camera is good.
 Good camera quality.
Very Good front and Back Camera at this Price.
Camera quality is not as effective as should have been for a 13 back  5 front camera.
Camera is good but in future update it may get more improved.
worth of money with superb battery backup and awesome camera quality.
3. camera is very good  
Camera is super fine   both front and rear 
nice phone from acer gud performance and user friendly UI no hanging no heating battery back up is gud but front camera is not gud as expected.
front camera excellent  rear need some improvement.
good camera.
Phone camera is good  but hangs when you are running out of space.
good camera quality
Good performance  battery is very good  camera is average  but in the price range we can t expect more.
9  The flash performance of the camera is very good
4  Very good rear camera   have compared against Mi4i   Galaxy J7 and HTC 826   Asus wins hands down on bright as well as low light photography.
Front camera is excellent.
camera is so good.
Camera quality is good
overall camera quality is more effective than Lenovo K3 Note and the laser works better speed focusing.
 Vry superb mobile  gorila screen lolved it  anti touch  camera quality pakka superb  wifi streangth vry low  dual sim  battery 3000 superb standby mode amazing.
great camera and fast processing  good battery life.
The camera is good.
Pros are   Good resolution  nice camera  high internal storage  smooth functioning  large screen.
camera quality is also good.
camera is very good both front and back some people may have complained about the rear camera i think they should buy a DSLR instead of a mobile.
Front camera is also fine .
 It is so nice battery backup also very very good camera clarity also very good condition 
Its camera is average not too good like 13mp.
Camera good many features loved it.
front camera is great  
Camera is quite above the Average but not Perfect it gives poor quality of picture in night but is is quit good if you see it s cost is 10k so it is Over all Good performance of Camera  
good camera quality even in low light good battery back up no heating issue till now.
Good camera rear and front  Rear volume button comes handy for taking selfies too 
up is good not too good 1fault is that there is front camera no video mode is available.
If you don t care much about Camera  Still camera quality is good  For Internet and Gaming usage this fantastic phone.
The matte finish material really looks stealthy  battery wise  very happy display and color rendition very good  very good camera with very good features and modes for different occasions  very light n asus well in your hand and your pocket 
looks nice  battery backup is average  camera is good but not best.
it is handy and camera quality is awesome and overall superb 
 Product is good as per the price and no lagging and camera quality is great.
so this issue can be solved by using good front screen protector  .
3  good front camera.
camera is good no heating problem battery life is also good 
Rear Camera is not as good as front camera.
Good camera especially the manual mode .
i am really satisfied by this phone it has super b camera  good battery life awesome touch and fast speed and it was delievered to me before delievery date.
camera is good at this price with laser focus.
Click image opning prosees slow  selfie camera is very nice 8 10 
its 13 mp camera is just equal to samsung s 5 mp camera in the terms of quality of the image.
Very good camera features.
 Perfect mobile it has good features front camera and back camera is also two good 
the camera is very good.
Good Camera Quality  battery backup 2GB RAM etc.
1. good camera both  some people commenting camera is bad for them guys take photo in manual mode u will get awesome quality and super resolution mode it gives more detailing after zooming the photo 
user interface and camera is also good.
Good battery backup and very good camera.
 great camera quality even in low light good battery back up no heating issue untill now.
its truly awsome  good camera quality even in low light good battery backup no heating issue till now.
camera is good both front and back  best part is taking slefie just by clicking back volume button 
No heating problems  camera is good  no handing issues  but pre.
camera is good.
If you want a good camera phone than go for it.
Great battery life and good camera.
1. good quality back and front camera 
camera quality is good and performance is also nice with 2 gb ram .
SAME REAR CAMERA IS NOT UP TO THE MARK WHILE FRONT CAMERA IS JUST OK.
but the  CAMERA QUALITY IS VERY VERY POOR  if you re interested in CAMERA please don t buy it is very bad .
 If u want a good phone unless u r game addict n want a high quality pics n great camera because these are some concs of dis mobile.
camera quality is good 
camera quality is good.
A beast with high quality camera  awesome battery backup  powerful performance  fantastic UI  Premium designs It has everything that a good phone should have 
Screen quality best and camera first class or mini movie facility 
The camera quality is okay.
Good camera  becomes the BEST after a simple auto update.
A very good13 mp rear   5 mp sefie camera produces sharp and clear pics with good detailing the best camera within the 10k range and even better than samsung e6 redmi lenovo.
7  Good Camera
I still don t like front camera as front camera works great only in good light.
13 MP primary and 5 MP front camera are better than the others.
 The phone has great battery charge and good camera.
If you want a good camera phone with a decent processor in the 10k range this is the best money can buy you.
A very good phone with good pricing and great camera functions even at night.
good camera nd speed.
Good camera
best camera   front   back both are best quality photo.
13 MP Rear and 5 MP front cameras give good quality decent images at this price.
this phone is awsome if you update your phone camera is good in daylight but we can only have below 1gb ram .
5 Camera is pretty decent especially the front camera.
Otherwise other features are working good  camera specification is exaggerated  but its good for 10k and touch and battery till now is working fine.
taking about mobile  nice body graphics  good display quality   better mobile resolution  3000mAmp battery provides good battery life   loud speaker  front camera is very good .
2. both camera are very good
camera quality is good but it should have been 32 GB internal  
Front camera is awesome when compared to rear camera.
Best phone in price range having gorilla glass giving you smooth buttery touch experience battery backup is great camera also good as compaired to mi 4i and more over its design is mind blowing my friends also decide to buy this phone.
Camera is also good.
camera quality is also good 
Camera  On most occasions  the camera did give good to average pics especially with ample light .
front camera for selfie is excellent and rear camera is better than lenovo k3 and mi4i at this budget and many features are given with caera application that other phones dont have.
The front camera is as good as those in the One plus and other flagship phone.
Excellent camera quality in the price range of 8K.
Good camera quality
camera is vey good as my opinion.
Don t get me wrong  the camera is good for the price range under 10   can compete against competitors like Yurekas and k3 notes but it just doesn t punch out in this category like it does in battery  feel  build  display smoothness  software  less heating issues etc.
The 5MP front is good  although images are little grainy when zoomed.
The front 5mp camera is ok.
Excellent front 5.
Both the front and the back camera have good quality with a lot of options  Can t wait to use the selfie panorama  Thanks flipkart  
bur front 5mp camera is good
Worth to buy   camera is good  strong battery backup  large screen  best phone in this range  faster delivery 
Also phone is very light camera is good.
About camera front 5 mp shooter is best in this prise segment and 13mp rear is also Good enough considering price
But as compared to moto and lenovo its good camera and larger works well.
Good camera quality 
Camera is just brilliant so is sound quality.
Good camera quality.
good battery backup  both camera s are good the selfie quality is awesome it can beat the iPhone s 6s camera s quality 
Camera is good both front and back.
Very good display  no heating issue  good battery life  smooth touch screen   above all excellent camera.
Selfie camera is good enough   gives good wide panorama Selfies.
Good Camera with Flash also has good access time.
The camera is also good.
Good build quality camera is nice  
Good thing is that it has a gorilla glass and camera is awesome.
Camera quality is excellent.
but the front camera doesnt work properly with the low light feature in it.
Good camera quality even in low light good battery back up no heating issue till now.
Good camera and worth for every penny.
 Best mobile in this price range with super features and best camera quality.
Front camera is good compared to the rear cam.
Camera is pretty good.
1 front camera is excellent you can also use beautification mode for better experience
Front camera is alright But lacks Video recording.
Camera is very nice too.
 The camera is good.
Good Camera  UI and RAM enough for normal usage.
Camera is good as compare to other phones.
Camera is very nice if i select the Super resolution then camera will convert 51 MP.
but front camera is really nice.
Camera is good in sunlight  
But the quality of front camera is very nice.
I m loving it awesome phone camera quality is manageable but still a good phone 
Good front and back cameras.
Excellent front cam.
I found some bad reviews about camera but for me the camera quality is really good.
--------------------------------------------------------
worst battery  -28
Call clarity is good and battery last for a full day.
Long battery life .
performance and battery backup is too good.
Battery backup is too good.
I have used its Zenfone 5 model earlier which was good in other departments except poor battery and heat up issue while gaming and charging.
Worth to buy   camera is good  strong battery backup  large screen  best phone in this range  faster delivery 
15 hour to charge from 10  to 100  but its not an issue because which gives a good battery backup about 1.
Now  since  long battery life is more important to me  i cancelled Moto and pre.
Very nice good looking and performance no heating very good to catch and extra battery performance no issues frm 6mnth 
2 Amazing battery life will last for 24hrs for a decent usage
Battery Backup is pretty much good but nothing to cheers.
Battery Backup Very Good last for 1 and 1 2 Day after use
Every thing is good in phone  battery last 2 days with heavy use.
It is powered by a Qualcomm Snapdragon 410 chipset  along with 2GB of RAM and a 3000mAh battery which should last you through a regular days usage without
Battery is really good  if u used mobile data with 3G 4G drain faster  so wifi is a good idea for long surfing  battery can stay upto 20 hrs with full surfing.
 With gorilla glass 4 you are safe and with 3000mah battery is huge for a day 
Asus seemed better to me as my colleague also told me that battery life is awesome and I got the same one.
taking about mobile  nice body graphics  good display quality   better mobile resolution  3000mAmp battery provides good battery life   loud speaker  front camera is very good .
Long battery life.
It provides decent photographs with a long battery life.
But this device in real life performance is just exponential in terms of pure looks  feel usage   value for money.
 firstly i like to buy k3 note but due to out of stock from many days i ordered this phone and now i am so happy by using this product without any problem and far better than k3 note no heating issue good display good ram very good battery performance good camera quality smooth touch and zero lag.
it is handy and camera quality is awesome and overall superb 
Good battery life  awsome camera and worth of price totally its an amazing phone in budget that too under 10k .nice battery  219
Battery life is good compared to other phoes in this range.
Battery backup is very good as it is still 20  remain after heavy use of 24hours  
Excellent battery life.
Good battery.
good battery backup.
Good battery 
and battery back up is good as well as the camera features are also good.
Ans Someone said about Yureka  Mi4i etc which is having 615 processor  Yeah  ask the people who own that hand set how much battery life they are getting if they played ASPHALT 8 continuously or Turn on Wifi or Watch Movies back to back  Qualcom 410 is the best choice that ASUS made on this phone.
and also very good battery backup.
4. good battery
2. amazing battery life lasts long a full 24 hours for moderate to heavy usage.
good battery backup 
on using 2 months the camera is good front is not bad the battery back up is cool better than intel os.
2. battery life is ok
Battery Backup is good.
Best battery life
Good features and good battery.
touch excellent
comparing with other smartphones battery is good.
3  3000 mah battery which is removable   100 mah more than K3  
Overall this phone is a beast  has a superb battery backup  got lot many features like the double tap wake up  gorilla glass 4and lot many feature that you don t get in costly mobiles in price range of 20 000 like the new Moto X Play I have bought this phone recently from flipkart .
Excellent Battery performance  Superb video   Audio quality I just fan of the Asus Zenfone 2.
Battery backup is to good for me
battery is good.
Good battery back up.
Battery backup  9 10 Very good.
Superb touch effect.
Battery is excellent 
It has a good battery life and backup.
Battery  backup is good draing very slowly lasts up to 24 hours with heavy use with continues mobile data on 
Battery like is good which give a daily use life of 1.
Battery backup is also good
Good battery back up more than 24hrs even under heavy usage.
Battery is really good  if u used mobile data with 3G 4G drain faster  so wifi is a good idea for long surfing  battery can stay upto 20 hrs with full surfing.
but its good for battery 
Quite superb battery life.
3  3000 mah user replacable battery is enough to last a whole day with moderate to heavy usage.
Battery life also good.
Value for money battery life is very very good it s very good product  
handy and good battery and camera.
8  Good battery life so far   lasts 1.
My other friend also bought same phone 4 months back from flipkart only but he is getting good battery backup  I got inspiration from that only and bought this one.
Good battery performance 
All smartphone user want a good battery.
Good Battery backup
5 5. battery life is also verry good.
Good battery Backup  easy to hold in my hands.
4. phone charges in a very less time  and especially the battery life is very good.
a  Really good battery life.
worth of money with superb battery backup and awesome camera quality.
Good battery  almost a day last.
Good battery backup and very good camera.
Amazing phone with good battery backup even with clash of clans it handles very well and I can play coc for the whole day and then even after all the battery remains 10.
If you don t care about looks and If you need a reading device with a good battery backup and you don t care about connectivity issues over 3G you can go with this phone.
battery backup also good
Touch  Superb.
 A very good mobile under 10K neat design and easy to hold and excellent battery backup and camera too.
2 Amazing battery life will last for 24hrs for a decent usage
Fortunately  it s not like other custom UI s which claim to optimise the software but isn t of much use in real life.
Very good battery backup 
Battery life is good and furthur enhanced by software.
Good battery backup for whole day function and good build quality and features 
Battery backup is really good.
battery life is good  attractive HD display.
I just want to say that in this range this is a awesome product good battery good sound n the best part is the screen.
Good battery backup
Apart from this  the phone has really good features  a great battery and the Customized Zen UI is really smooth and easy to use.
 It is so nice battery backup also very very good camera clarity also very good condition 
good battery life
Superb dual led flash
Battery life is very good  Even more than expected.
The battery backup is pretty good.
good battery.
Excellent battery backup
 Its a great phone with great battery life .
super battery life.
good battery backup  both camera s are good the selfie quality is awesome it can beat the iPhone s 6s camera s quality 
good battery backup
Good battery life for 3000mah battery.
Battery  Backup seems good as it goes down gradually.
camera is good no heating problem battery life is also good 
Battery backup is very good.
style is simple superb.
i am really satisfied by this phone it has super b camera  good battery life awesome touch and fast speed and it was delievered to me before delievery date.
Battery backup is very good 
Nice one good battery backup performance and display so good 
Overall verdict   If you want a good budget camera phone with good battery backup and large display  then go for it.
It has very good battery backup with just 3000 mAh battery.
Battery life has also been surprisingly good so far.
 Camera is super 4G also enabled battery is 3000 mah super 3 day in battery power 
Really my new phone is superb superb superb.
 Vry superb mobile  gorila screen lolved it  anti touch  camera quality pakka superb  wifi streangth vry low  dual sim  battery 3000 superb standby mode amazing.
 Phone is good   decent battery backup   great performance.
excellent battery life.
Battery backup is also good.
battery life is good
Battery life is more than good.
Great Battery Life.
Great battery life and good camera.
Superb product  touch feels so good  battery life ad long compare to all other my smart phone  next phone after my nokia i saw its best phone  zen lu OS as superb n make it more comfortable.
and it have a good battery backup in this segment 
Class phone with all the features of high end phone  very good battery back up.
A beast with high quality camera  awesome battery backup  powerful performance  fantastic UI  Premium designs It has everything that a good phone should have 
3  3000 mAH Battery is good to have in a 5.
Battery backup is good.
Sound and battery back up is also very good.
Very Good Battery given life for full day with normal usage
 The phone has great battery charge and good camera.
Excellent battery backup and performance too.
1  Excellent Battery
Great battery life
Otherwise other features are working good  camera specification is exaggerated  but its good for 10k and touch and battery till now is working fine.
Asus seemed better to me as my colleague also told me that battery life is awesome and I got the same one.
taking about mobile  nice body graphics  good display quality   better mobile resolution  3000mAmp battery provides good battery life   loud speaker  front camera is very good .
Battery backup is quite good.
Excellent battery Back up.
 Good phone with super long battery life  but not that good camera.
So many features to make your life easier than ever.
3000mah battery does its best.
Battery backup is very good  4.
Furthermore  it looks decent  is built well and has great battery life.
Also has good battery life.
Awesome camera quality  loud sound and good battery life.
Worth to buy   camera is good  strong battery backup  large screen  best phone in this range  faster delivery 
The matte finish material really looks stealthy  battery wise  very happy display and color rendition very good  very good camera with very good features and modes for different occasions  very light n asus well in your hand and your pocket 
Good Battery Backup.
For me  it made my life easier.
Good battery but takes looong time to charge 
Good battery backuo and good multitasking.
Now  since  long battery life is more important to me  i cancelled Moto and pre.
6  Battery life is excellent
The battery backup is good and the overall performance is also good.
Battery  It lasts long for a phablet   on most occasions even gave better life than smaller screen devices.
Good Battery LIFE lasts more than 24 hrs
nice touch excellent battery life rich look no heating issue.
Battery back up is good.
The phone is good battery back.
i was looking for good battery backup and good performance and camera and all was my second priority.
Battery back good  While writing this review my battery was 44    second day was running.
excellent battery
Performance is impressive   good battery life with average camera quality.
But after reading reviews on good battery life  I bought Zenfone 2 Laser.
And battery back is also good it comes for 2 day without using internet and using internet the battery back up will come for 1 and 1half day 
Battery life is good 
Good battery backup.
Battery life is good.
The battery backup is very excellent and charging speed is also good.
Good  recently I doubt on battery backup .
Good Battery Backip.
Otherwise it is good with battery backup and camera clarity.
--------------------------------------------------------
worst mobile  -60
product is perfect but only telenor card not detected otherwise superb phone batery backup is also good.
Initially i thought that ASUS is a new company in smartphone market but after buying this phone i think that it was a very good decision.
Camera performance is above good but not excellent  ASUS need to improve 
The product is overall good.
Overall  ASUS ZENFONE 2 LASER is currently the best sub 10k phone.
It s not a graphic intensive device in the price range and no device in this segment plays extremely high graphics games  especially without heating.
9199. main thing which i like d most is battery backup of this phone is just amazing which can t b compare with any other device .
I have applied for a replacement and got my new device which is perfect.
Asus is already working on the same.
But the issue is the bloatware apps added by ASUS  some of them can be uninstalled or disabled.
I am using Samsung mobile  compare to samsung this mobile is good as process wise but the camera result  some of sound setting is not as expected on this mobile.
 Good cell worth of money collected 2 piece of same product better then cheap 
1  The sound quality of ASUS is good but the loudness is not as much as you expect.
poor quality in discount time product not good in this time i have this problem second time
Seller is also efficient and i got the device within 4 days after booking which is fast according to me.
The several ASUS apps within the zenfone that connect you to other people actually connect you only to other zenfone users.
The product is too good.
Also ive contacted Asus service center where they said the internal board might be misplaced so my device is defective.
  common asus plz fix this camera issue worst camera eva if u fix that i ll give 5 5 
But overall its very good Mobile.
camera not good  as compared to ASUS s one and most important It s not stable at all.
another good product from asus.
 This product is good   But the rear camera is not as per standard.
less than 10k it s a good product.
This device has negligible heating even while charging and using the device simultaneously.
The device is seamless and out performs most of my basic and even high end requirements .
as other asus zenfones it also comes with a awesome ZENUI which is the best part of every zenfones.
but back not good  this device have only one problem .
Its not good mobile for gaming.
Mobile is very good and very user friendly and smooth in using this mobile and features are very good i have never seen in any other mobile like this.
The device goes blank sometimes.
If I am wrong then you ve got some good eyes or have used a flagship device for so long 
Asus smart Looking Is Good.
It can outperform any other device in this price bracket.
Overall Its a good Product.
Though it s a large device and pixel density is only 264 ppi  still i could not feel the difference with other devices.
 the mobile is nice compared to 10k range and camera quality is also good   better than k3 note and other fones  if u like it thn go for it but before buying go for full review in youtube 
Overall  very satisfied with the product.
Last but not the least at all  the games  if are supported by it  yep its not a gaming beast you would like it to be  due to low processor speed  will run so smooth and the device doesn t heat up or just only heats up to around 37  which is normal.
 Love you ASUS   thank to ASUS for such a nice phone  thanks to flipkart outstanding battery backup nice display just outstanding  
Camera performance is above good but not excellent  ASUS need to improve on that  3.
But system needs 1 gb ram for its own  only 3 to 4 hundred mb ram will remain  i have moto g2 it has i gb ram  but still get 3 to 4 hundred mb ram free ram  overall good product  accessories are not available in the market  
Same features like my other Asus Phone.
You can wait for the OTA updates from ASUS  and they will solve it by then i hope. 
Got my new Asus Zenfone 2 Laser.
I Have suggested to my mobile asus zenfone 2 laser ZE550KL is not working SIM 2 Slot.
 firstly i like to buy k3 note but due to out of stock from many days i ordered this phone and now i am so happy by using this product without any problem and far better than k3 note no heating issue good display good ram very good battery performance good camera quality smooth touch and zero lag.
The Circle View flip cover is amazing and though original asus one is costly  u can buy the pudini provided at just around Rs 400 and its even better than the original.
 good device for new android users.
Very very disappointed with Asus  was one of my favourite company .
there is tool Asus auto start manager it solves all battery drain issues in android.
its very awesome and superb mobile phone  have recently preordered it and now just got it  literally its superb one  having good quality  shape  size  weight  is fare enough  but only one thing is that the screen display is not up to the mark  its very dull  but other than this  nothing is wrong with this phone  most important and good feature of this phone is the battery of this phone  its really good enough.awesome mobile  138
Mobile is good but.
Service  Nightmare  if you visit Asus authorized service center you never buy or recommend this mobile to any one
All features in this Mobile is very good and having Lazer on the back with 13MP camera it is super It can easily Satisfied Costomer no problem is there in This Mobile.
 this good product under 10000 rupees.
The build and Quality is just superb and I Love that concentric circles which is a unique Asus Design.
Also  Asus has been prompt enough to provide OS upgrade to all its previous phones from Jellybean to KitKat to Lollipop.
its a better product from asus
Overall  very satisfied with the product.
It was a good product to choose as compared with others  delivered on time as always  and working all fine till date.
The device is able to handle almost all apps   games what one would install.
good mobile and everything is fine   no any issue 
 Good mobile  with good decent specifications.
A great device to have.
Good mobile under 10k.
the product is good and an awesome buy under 10k 
I bought this product ASUS ZenFone 2 laser a good product  good quality good performance 
Mobile is very good and very user friendly and smooth in using this mobile and features are very good i have never seen in any other mobile like this.
Every thing in this mobile is good like 
It is good mobile.
 It s a very good product.
But i don t afraid from him and take a risk after that i very happy with Asus and Asus product and i want to say specially thanks to flipkart for on time delivery.
and highly recommended who are looking for good mobile in budget 10k range 
Overall Its a good Product.
Please rectify and release best products ASUS all the best.
over good product in middle budget  photography lovers can go for it.
Nice Mobile  great camera and good service by service center people.
I am really satisfied with this product.
5 inch device  its good for watching movies.
Asus is best but please provide basic earphone with phone.
 In this price Asus Zenfone 2 Laser ZE550KL is very good mobile.
Mobile looks sexy and performance also good.
The display is awesome as it is crisp and the viewing angles are also good  asus says its 178 deg .
very good product 
And I fell very good mobile phone including all features   under rs.
 It s a good product in this range.
ASUS ZENUI is absolutely amazing good gaming experience all in all worthy product in my opinion.
ordered two zenfone 2 laser phone and am really happy with this device.
Very nice device  very good quality.
Asus is awesome for gamers.
Good Mobile at this price  good display and camera.
But at this point of time  the device looks really promising.
Its the best device in this price range.
phone camera little low other wise very good mobile no hang the phone 
But overall its very good Mobile.
good product for this price and it reached the destination before the scheduled date  which has added extra flavour for this product 
 A very good mobile under 10K neat design and easy to hold and excellent battery backup and camera too.
Its been 4 weeks that i purchased this phone and overall it is a good product   Alhumdullilah
while ASUS is stable  awesome UI  camera take awesome picture in low light.
5  Screen  the device is not huge.
Value for money battery life is very very good it s very good product  
Good Product.
 The best Android Device Experienced till now  
I have Three No s of this Asus Zenfone laser 550KL mobile working good compare to Asus old models
Very good product at this price.
They run a forum called the zentalk which is even moderated by asus technical team.
Especially the apps like mini movie  launcher  asus mobile manager audio wizerd  etc.
very good mobile at this price 
 Mobile looked good at first glance and was totally satisfied at this cost though few bugs were there in the software until I came across this major issue with both the SIMs.
I just want to say that in this range this is a awesome product good battery good sound n the best part is the screen.
This is my first ASUS smartphone and I really liked it.
Next bad thing is that there is no service center of Asus mobile available in nearer in Pune.
charging is good nd camera is superb only front cam  less weight mobile.
he was really surprised by seeing this wonderful and gorgeous device.
Superb Mobile   Very good and stylish   Worthable for this price    
finally I am satisfied with this product.
s w updates 9 10  Asus is good here  
How else is ASUS able to provide such mouth.
mobile is very good  but Screen zooming is annoying   while outgoing call  facing many issue while selecting the sim.
Mobile is good and amazing and easy to handle .
 Good product for this amount .
device is working smooth and good.
But overall Asus Zenfone 2 Laser is the best phone in the sub 10k budget  its better than other phone in this price range like Xiomi Note 4G  Yu Yureka Plus  Lenovo K3 Note   Moto G. this is the best phone at10k budget.
The product is overall good.
It is a good mobile worth spending high quality good sound amazing display 
I have applied for a replacement and got my new device which is perfect.
GOOD MOBILE BELOW 12000 NICE .
Good product.
and Asus has proved it once again that Asus is the best.
flipkart delivery date is accurate and the device seems good.
 Good product at affordable price.
This is an awesome device with premium look and performance.
If not your device is defective.
less than 10k it s a good product.
good product.
 pretty amazing phone i havent experienced any probs till now hope i wont coz asus is incredible.
My fist phone was moto g 16 gb ram brought from flipkart  has to say performance wise it is far better than asus.
Product is so good.
Good to have this mobile.
The snapdragon 410 chipset is bit old so ASUS could provide a better processor.
 Good device  but most if the RAM is taken up by its own apps  remove them   device runs fast.
 Good mobile in 10k range and gorilla glass 4 is awesome and value for money 
 very very good mobile I like it after updating everything is well 
good product go for it but the dilevery was little late i think bcoz of the government holiday.
Asus seemed better to me as my colleague also told me that battery life is awesome and I got the same one.
Speaker output is ok. Would have been great if ASUS provided earphones with this.
 Good mobile to buy at good price.
Very Good product.
this mobile is very very good looking.
Good product in all respects for the price.
Asus great.
 Thank you for sending good product after replacement the previous one within 6 days.
and i came to the conclusion that this is the best device under 10k.
 Good product.
 Product is good as per the price and no lagging and camera quality is great.
Great product from asus.
Good mobile with great spec.
 Very nice product from asus.
 good product
product is good to use and very user friendly  flipkart delivery was also fast.
good mobile in its range.
 Mobile is good  on time delivery.
Over all product is good  Those who are looking for a budget phone under 10K can simply goahead and buy this phone.
look is also good thank you fipkart with such a great product 
Product is good.
Over all the product was good but some issues are there.
 The mobile is good.
5 Decent gaming device Not a heavy gaming one Don t think about playing heavy AAA titles that can be handled only by flagship phones
 Good Product.
This is a good product for 9k.
Hand Feel of the Device is Good as the Weight of the Phone is Well.
there are lot of unique feature provided by Asus zenUI  lot of customizations are available and usable asus apps Like u can use ur mobile as wireless mouse.
wonderful device from asus every thing is perfect on phone rich looks  rich graphics build quality every thing is perfect on phone 
1st I got a bad hang product but They replaced the product and now I am using good product.
 It is a good product to the value its very nice to purchase.
The Circle View flip cover is amazing and though original asus one is costly  u can buy the pudini provided at just around Rs 400 and its even better than the original.
 good device for new android users.
Over all Good Product and Nice Design By Asus.
--------------------------------------------------------
bad_sound  -67
The sound quality is just so poor.
Sound is extremely low and poor with earphones or headphones.
sound is bit low but can be increased using audio wizard.
I don t like loud sound of chienese phones.
73  as used even after cleaning memory and memory boost function and when playing mp4 video files the sound was very low to listen but finally i found one icon on the app Soud EQ we can increase the audio video volume by using this settings  now the sound is far better than samsung J7 battery is getting 2 full days even if full time net using.
The rear camera quality is not good like 13MP.
2 The sound is decent not average Ring volume is high enough You have tweak the sound using the sound wizard app and most your worries is solved
2. speaker sound quality is average.
1  Low sound but acceptable writing this under cons just because i dont want to leave it empty  P  
Earpiece is loud and clear but the rear speaker has little low sound but ringtone was audible in the Mumbai local train at evening time also.
Sound  7 10    Sound quality is very good  but you will not get much bass .
Good phone with budget   but output sound quality is little thin.
Speaker sound is not that high like a loud micromax phone but no disappointment  since it a phone and not a loud speaker.
its very awesome and superb mobile phone  have recently preordered it and now just got it  literally its superb one  having good quality  shape  size  weight  is fare enough  but only one thing is that the screen display is not up to the mark  its very dull  but other than this  nothing is wrong with this phone  most important and good feature of this phone is the battery of this phone  its really good enough.
4 Speakers and Headphone output   As expected the sound was mediocre but Headphone output was good.
Speaker sound is average can be better 
but rear camera is nice got in a day deliver they delivered very nxt day and sound is little low but call sound is very high overall gud value for money.
but back camera Quality is not that much good .
Camera quality is not good compared to peers like Mi4 Moto G etc.
overall quality is good.
good quality  looking good  but camera quality is not my expect range.
Good quality to view on laptop  but not good if you want to print.
i dont know why ppl are saying its picture quality is not so good.
Sound Quality is very good but not loud
Camera quality is too good.
Speaker quality is not good.
Little low sound when put on loud speaker 
sound is quite low but acceptable u can use earphones as well as speakers.
This phone has very low sound quality.
But Actualy its not take good quality photo.
4. charger quality is not as good as expected.
camera quality is ok. but not so good .
2  Rear camera quality not good
do not think just buy if you have no issue with sound quality.
Camera is poor  sound quality also very slow.
 the mobile is nice compared to 10k range and camera quality is also good   better than k3 note and other fones  if u like it thn go for it but before buying go for full review in youtube 
4  External speaker sound is feeble.
 Nice mobile everything is all right but one issue in this mobile  sound is low but i am happy.
Call quality very GOOD
6 Sound is not loud but decent.
Back cover quality is good but not easily removable.
When I capture a photo and check that photo in my phone and click to zoom but pixels are blur  not good in zooming quality .
1 sound quality is little bit low but its not too much low you can use headphone .
Sound quality is really nice but the loudness is not up to the mark Dont get me wrong here I m not saying that its bad but it is actually low to my liking   if i would hv to rate it out of 10 I ll give it 7 to 7.
Sound output Is great some were saying its low i chkd it for myself i damn loud with clear sound quality.
In night the camera quality is not so good.
less sound .
Camera Performance Screen quality is too too too good.
Sound yes as i mention earlier its not up to the mark This is seriously doesn t matter to me 90  ppl nw use headset and they are the best in every sound department i hd to write some cons so i hv written this fr the public purpose hope it helps 
But Sound is little low
 firstly i like to buy k3 note but due to out of stock from many days i ordered this phone and now i am so happy by using this product without any problem and far better than k3 note no heating issue good display good ram very good battery performance good camera quality smooth touch and zero lag.
It s not boom sound or anything but it s more than enough for a small room.
but sound quality is not good.
sound is not good good sound  133
best performance good looking  no hang and all about best quality.
Good phone with budget   but output sound quality is little thin.
Camera quality is good 
Speaker sound is average can be better 
Camera quality is good.
1  13mp laser auto focus provides very good quality images along with the front facing 5mp camera
6 Sound is not loud but decent.
Sound is good as well.
Camera quality is really good.
Good sound effect.
I bought this product ASUS ZenFone 2 laser a good product  good quality good performance 
Build quality is very good.
It is a good mobile worth spending high quality good sound amazing display 
good sound quality
front and back camera quality is very good 
The camera performance is simply super and the sound quality is also good.
Someone suggest me some good quality headsets with mic which support this model as there was no headset in the packet.
good sound its louder then other phones.
Camera is poor  sound quality also very slow.
Call quality very GOOD
8 Good calling quality 
Sound is decent but little bit low.
It s a good quality product from asus .
Sound output Is great some were saying its low i chkd it for myself i damn loud with clear sound quality.
Good and decent sound are producing 
7. good quality
Sound is also good .
Good sound through headphone  no head phone provided  
Sound isn t that loud but the quality is great.
Phone is awesome full of features quality is also good 
camera quality is good and performance is also nice with 2 gb ram .
Very nice device  very good quality.
Sound is very nice 
Call quality and sound is good
poor quality in discount time product not good in this time i have this problem second time
and having very good resolution and sound quality.
To people who say the pictures are grainy can try the various modes available and a few changes to the settings to get good quality picture.
Sound quality .
overall quality is good.
Sound quality is up to mark.
Battery backup is very good  screen quality  touch response  2g3g4g connectivity  gaming  all seems very good  I haven t found any issue.
Camera quality is good
Good picture quality  good sound also.
1  Built quality is very good.
The built quality is also good.
Sound Quality Seems to be poor at first.
Sound Quality is good.
I found some bad reviews about camera but for me the camera quality is really good.
If you don t care much about Camera  Still camera quality is good  For Internet and Gaming usage this fantastic phone.
But the most disappointing feature is that after the first update that I got  the sound through headphones is not so good in terms of BASS  even though using AUDIO WIZARD but sound is very loud and clear.
 Nice mobile everything is all right but one issue in this mobile  sound is low but i am happy.
1 sound quality is little bit low but its not too much low you can use headphone .
Camera is quite above the Average but not Perfect it gives poor quality of picture in night but is is quit good if you see it s cost is 10k so it is Over all Good performance of Camera  
very very very very powerful sound output with clear sound n booming bass.
but using the Audio manager We could increase the Sound Quality and its fantastic after all.
Voice call quality is very good  and the earpiece is very clear and loud.
Overall pics quality are very good even in nights and low lights.
good battery backup  both camera s are good the selfie quality is awesome it can beat the iPhone s 6s camera s quality 
Speaker sound is good but compared to other phones it is low.
 valueable product according to money features are pretty good undifined quality as compares to other i am really thankfull to fli kart to give me that special rpoduct that is what that i actually want 
Sound Quality .
Call quality was good.
Camera is Awesome  sound is good with great display and speed is superb.
1  Low sound but acceptable writing this under cons just because i dont want to leave it empty  P  
Network reception quality is also very good.
very good quality camera.
1. good camera both  some people commenting camera is bad for them guys take photo in manual mode u will get awesome quality and super resolution mode it gives more detailing after zooming the photo 
Call quality is excellent  4G works on both sims without any issues  out of the box storage is about 11 GB  sound output is a bit low.
However the apps are of very good quality  compared to similar paid apps so lots of savings there  and majority can be easily uninstalled.
Sound Quality.
The sound quality is great.
Design and build quality is also good 
Design and build quality is also good.
On ear phones sound is very good.
1. good quality back and front camera 
camera quality is good 
 If u want a good phone unless u r game addict n want a high quality pics n great camera because these are some concs of dis mobile.
camera quality is good.
A beast with high quality camera  awesome battery backup  powerful performance  fantastic UI  Premium designs It has everything that a good phone should have 
good pictures quality  good sound quality  overall a value for your money.
Build quality is good.
Sound quality is bit a low else everything are fabulous.
Good quality sealed product 
With inbuilt Asus Audio Wizard and Google Music Equalizer it produces awesome sound effect with heavy Bass   I am using Creative EP630 .
Build quality is really good backed by Asus Trust.
13 MP Rear and 5 MP front cameras give good quality decent images at this price.
Both front and back Camera quality is very good.
Very good quality and feel.
 after 6 month of using this product  is good quality of battery and display only one negative side is phone comes without handsfree.
9  Music quality is good.
looks are very good for a 10k phone 5 5. display quality is very good and smooth.
You need few more bucks to listen to its sound quality.
camera quality is also good 
camera quality is also good.
 Product is good as per the price and no lagging and camera quality is great.
Built quality is good.
camera quality is good but it should have been 32 GB internal  
Screen quality is very good 
3. video and sound quality is good
Both the front and the back camera have good quality with a lot of options  Can t wait to use the selfie panorama  Thanks flipkart  
Camera is just brilliant so is sound quality.
its very nice sound and display and color and speed of ram 
 Gud phn gud display gud Betry backup and sound quality is very gud  
Sound Quality is very good but not loud
Sound quality is good if you enable the Audio wizard.
Build quality seems good.
Music and Sound Quality is very good and having the volume rocker behind the camera is nice 
sound quality .
Receiver and speakers good and loud compared to other 1st Gen Zenfones  mic quality is also good while recording videos or speech  also talking about call quality  its also great.
Pros Light in weight  build quality good Camera picture quality good  no heating issues.
Sound quality is also very nice.
I m loving it awesome phone camera quality is manageable but still a good phone 
Sound is good.
there is no voulme key for low and high sound controlling.
--------------------------------------------------------
bad performance  -26
Camera performance is above good but not excellent  ASUS need to improve 
The phone performance is very poor.
Battery give good performance on standby it will reduce charge dry apro  8  perday using over wifi very good not battery drying fast .
general performance is also good.
flawless performance  1.
Flawless performance .
Camera performance is very average.
 firstly i like to buy k3 note but due to out of stock from many days i ordered this phone and now i am so happy by using this product without any problem and far better than k3 note no heating issue good display good ram very good battery performance good camera quality smooth touch and zero lag.
Performance is excellent and lag free
9  The flash performance of the camera is very good
 Overall performance is good compare to other phones in the same range Price .
The battery backup is good and the overall performance is also good.
8  Overall performance is great 
Rest if talking about the performance  it is working fine as per the configuration of the phone.
This Phone beats any other phone with its mere performance and features.
Camera performance is not excellent but its quit good for normal use.
Camera performance is above good but not excellent  ASUS need to improve on that  3.
5  Battery  SUPERB  i was surprised by its battery performance i charge it once a day even after using wifi 24 7 and watching 2.
performance is same from the date of purchase till date.
Camera is quite above the Average but not Perfect it gives poor quality of picture in night but is is quit good if you see it s cost is 10k so it is Over all Good performance of Camera  
Some times it founds low speaker volume but overall performance was totally good 
Average performance.
 Awesome features  connectivity and body design  with good  not best  gaming performance.
performance also too good.great performance  111
best performance good looking  no hang and all about best quality.
Great performance while playing high.
Gaming performance is good.
First i got it for my dad and i saw the build and performance to be very good.
You will have a great camera   highly customizable ui   stunning looks   decent performance   monster battery What else Do you expect   
Nice performance and excelent battery backup 
great performance for the money.
but performance is good 
But i think the performance will not be affected.
Gaming performance is also good  
But dont underestimate its performance.
 Overall phone having good performance except camera quality.
 I am giving after one month use   phone is good in this price range  Before buying I searched a lot  then come to conclusion for Asus   Lenavo K3 but latter one was out of stock so I went for Asus Zen 2laser  I am happy with the performance.
Performance is smooth no lag   i was running apps   music  internet  games  5 5 ratings for that .
cam performance signal strength all are upto the mark.
from such a low cost phone  Isn t it actually amazing  no a miracle  how they managed to squeeze in such mid range specs in under 10 000  If you wanted a phone with   Super fast performance  best gaming  no heating  excellent battery   etc.
Good performance  Excellent battery life  UI gestures.
Is it fair to expect performance of a hogh end device costing 40.
Performance is really very good.
The camera performance is simply super and the sound quality is also good.
Excellent performance .
Mobile looks sexy and performance also good.
Performance is also very very good 
 Great performance in price segment.
camera quality is good and performance is also nice with 2 gb ram .
Very good all round performance.
Good performance for normal users.
4. battery performance is very nice.
Good performance  battery backup is above average and good  taking a bit more time to charge 100  few good features inbuilt like smart lock  no issue faced with proximity sensors.
Gaming performance is decent.
Whoever is looking for Good  Easy to use  Radiation free  handy and good performance phone then this is the right choice for you  Asus Zenfone 2 Laser ZE550KL  GO FOR IT  
 Snapdragon 410 processor is ok. performance is quit good.
Good performance  battery is very good  camera is average  but in the price range we can t expect more.
3  Battery performance is Excellent 
Good looking and very good performance.
Very nice good looking and performance no heating very good to catch and extra battery performance no issues frm 6mnth 
The Asus Zenfone 2 Laser may not be the best phone in terms of overall performance  certainly not prolonged gaming  and display clarity  but the camera unit is one of the best within sub.
8  Overall performance is great 
Rest if talking about the performance  it is working fine as per the configuration of the phone.
performance is good.
good looking and better performance 
no any mobile compare to asus very good performance this phone 
Performance is very good.
 Purchased few months back for one of my friend and its performance is really superb 
Battery performance is good Performance is smooth   i was running apps   music  internet  games And yes no Heating problem at all
 Laser ZE550KL is phone is great performance and look  software then etc
However performance is absolutely fluid  even moto G3 uses the same  for all uses except heavy gaming  GTA SA runs on medium settings smoothly .
Touch performance is smooth and fabulous.
Camera performance is better than other competitors under 10k
Decent performance.
 Good features  fast 4G LTE processor and 2 GB RAM give smooth performance.
The looks  Camera  UI  Ram Or gaming performance is quite decent and really great for its price range.
And in high performance mode  almost 28 hours backup  gaming  music  surfing.
Faster work and getting very good performance on wireless.
The phone feels good in the hand and the performance is great.
Speed is good and performance is almost satisfactory.
 this is the best phone and i had gifted to my dad  he loved it a lot and the performance is good  
general performance is also good.
 Good performance.
Good phone  no heating issues  camera is ok  performance is good  double tap screen is good  
Good at performance
Summary  Beautiful looking and fantastic performance with high configuration 
Graphics performance is also good enough.
A beast with high quality camera  awesome battery backup  powerful performance  fantastic UI  Premium designs It has everything that a good phone should have 
Performance is also good.
as u know given in specs great performance 
Phone performance is also good.
The performance is very good in every aspects except the camera quality  could have been better.
Go for it superb phone awesome battery backup n vesry smooth performance.
Best performance.
awesome performance .
all functions are great  no hanging issue   no heating  best display resolution  very good performance with quad core processor.
Some times it founds low speaker volume but overall performance was totally good 
5  Sensors performance are very good
Awesome display and excellent performance.
4 Decent performance chipset plenty RAM available for free
Anyway its good in performance and look.
Beast in class guys if you want to spend 10k then go for asus zenfone laser ccamera is like DSLR or great performance 
 Extraordinary performance this mob is better than moto editions 
V good phone fantastic beautiful and gives high performance.
camera performance is good and different modes increases its usage.
After using asus zenfone for last 3 days i observed that phone performance is very good.
Battery performance much better than my old Samsung phone.
Performance is excellent and lag free
The battery backup is good and the overall performance is also good.
I love this devil really awesome ws retail seller packing perfect  smooth performance I m almost use this phone non.
Stylish  sleek  looks expensive  performance is exceptionally good for a phone under 10k.
Excellent Performance.
Great performance
i was looking for good battery backup and good performance and camera and all was my second priority.
Battery performance is good  5 5 rating for that 
Good performance.
Performance is impressive   good battery life with average camera quality.
Performance is also good and screen display and features are awesome
--------------------------------------------------------
bad display  -16
Also In such a big display there is no need for capacitive buttons and could be replaced by software buttons as done in Xperia Series.
The display is good but Its not very sharp and has average PPI.
IPS Vivid Display HD is good not best not showing pure white on display  Lenovo K3 Note Providing Full HD 401PPI  
Love swiping the screen  The display is superb eventhough its not a Full HD.
One of the best product under 10k with great display and camera go for it guys dont worry 
Sharp   clear display.
Battery is enough for 1day  and display is stunning  overall I will rate it 7 out of 10  in this price range.
 firstly i like to buy k3 note but due to out of stock from many days i ordered this phone and now i am so happy by using this product without any problem and far better than k3 note no heating issue good display good ram very good battery performance good camera quality smooth touch and zero lag.
sensitive display
Display is dull compared to other 720p phones.
Once you call someone and place the phone to your ears  the display must black out.
no hanging smart display.
Where am I gonna run with a broken display .
no hanging smart display  
Display is dull with video playback.good display  61
5  large display.
Decent Display with Corning Gorilla Glass 4 protection which is 2X better than its predecessor.
IPS Vivid Display HD is good not best not showing pure white on display  Lenovo K3 Note Providing Full HD 401PPI  
Display is excellent .
Camera is Awesome  sound is good with great display and speed is superb.
I am quite satisfied with display and touch response  the colors are bright and beautiful.
fine display
Display is very nice and color reproduction is also very good.
5  Inch  good looking
Good Display.
4  Excellent Display quality
Display is awesome.
Camera  display  sound  performance all up.
5. inch  display PPI 267  720x1280px HD IPS display is large  at best.
display is so good.
7 Display is awesome
nice display n camera.
the nice display great build quality.
Very good display  no heating issue  good battery life  smooth touch screen   above all excellent camera.
Very Large display.
Display is royal.
Good and bright display.
Very good display.
5in hd display  the viewing angles are great and the display is crisp.
Display is best.
1  Display is great for the price little bit reflective when viewed outside
But take my words  the display is fabulous  
 After nearly four months of purchase  the mobile was kept for charging at night and the very next day the internal display was damage.
great display 5.
The matte finish material really looks stealthy  battery wise  very happy display and color rendition very good  very good camera with very good features and modes for different occasions  very light n asus well in your hand and your pocket 
5inch display looks very nice.
Display is superb 
yes 7  display is very good and hd and very good in bluefilter.
display is very good 
display is very good.
Display is awesome
Overall verdict   If you want a good budget camera phone with good battery backup and large display  then go for it.
Display is good.
Screen display is very good
Excellent display.
 Love you ASUS   thank to ASUS for such a nice phone  thanks to flipkart outstanding battery backup nice display just outstanding  
5 inch HD display is very good.
all functions are great  no hanging issue   no heating  best display resolution  very good performance with quad core processor.
Nice one good battery backup performance and display so good 
3. display good
Display Best ever in this class below 10k
Display turns black through out the call and was not able to access any call online options through screen.
Good Display
Image display is quite good.
Display  10 10    Awesome  very good.
Good display.
The display is awesome as it is crisp and the viewing angles are also good  asus says its 178 deg .
Good display 
 good display  tru vid color  good tone worth for this price  excellent battery on par with samsung  no heating issues  looks premium .
Large display with excellent touch response and design  one can handle it easily.
--------------------------------------------------------
bad quality  -10
Good build qualitys unlike a6000 plus lenovo it is not flipmsy 
It has a bad call quality  other side is no able to hear my voice clearly.
Call quality very GOOD
Only con is speaker is a little bit low but call quality is awesome and too much clear as compared to samsung grand.
Talking about camera and the auto laser focus  it does what its meant to or build for  focuses an object under a second  and with 13MP cam with Manual mode output of picture quality is great  although I was disappointed that Asus did not provided panosphere mode in camera as this device has gyro.
5. call quality is awesome.
and at last build quality   design of phone is excellent good quality  39
Call quality was good.
Build quality is solid and weight distribution is uniform.
5 phone call quality is great.
nice call quality
Call quality is excellent  4G works on both sims without any issues  out of the box storage is about 11 GB  sound output is a bit low.
Build quality is excellent.
The build and Quality is just superb and I Love that concentric circles which is a unique Asus Design.
Phone has very good build quality and feels great in hand.
Design and build quality is also good 
Design and build quality is also good.
Build quality is very good.
In my earlier phones like Gionee  it got a far better build up quality
Build quality seems good.
Call quality very GOOD
Voice call quality is very good  and the earpiece is very clear and loud.
Good build quality camera is nice  
Good battery backup for whole day function and good build quality and features 
2. have Good Build Quality Gorilla Glass and Touch response 
Build quality is good.
Receiver and speakers good and loud compared to other 1st Gen Zenfones  mic quality is also good while recording videos or speech  also talking about call quality  its also great.
Call quality is awesome.
Build quality is really good backed by Asus Trust.
Lesser SAR value  but giving excellent call quality 
Now when comes to device excellent build quality looks stylish.
build quality is also great
Only con is speaker is a little bit low but call quality is awesome and too much clear as compared to samsung grand.
5. call quality is awesome.
8 Good calling quality 
Pros Light in weight  build quality good Camera picture quality good  no heating issues.
5  Design and build quality is outstanding.
  call quality is decent.
Excellent call quality.
If Asus gets their quality check right then this is the phone for anyone who uses their phone for calling  short.
--------------------------------------------------------
usage  -25
Amazing battery back up with normal usage the phone can easily run upto 2 days with heavy usage it will go upto 16 hrs easily  
so ithink for any android its good   and if minimum usage only phone calls or little wats app   its battery can go for 2 days   because i experienced it .
Good battery back up more than 24hrs even under heavy usage.
but sometimes after heavy usage it lags
2. amazing battery life lasts long a full 24 hours for moderate to heavy usage.
After one month of full usage i can confidently say that i am very happy with this purchase and would recommend this phone to all.
Even with regular usage my phone can survive for more than 50 hours in one charge.
5 day after heavy usage.
On normal usage it would last almost 2 days.
battery  lasts one full day on average usage  
4  after occupying ram usage you will get atleast free 1.
2 Amazing battery life will last for 24hrs for a decent usage
Amazing battery back up with normal usage the phone can easily run upto 2 days with heavy usage it will go upto 14 hrs easily and with moderate usage it will go upto a day.
Easily last for one and half days with medium usage.
Battery can last up to a full working day with normal to mixed usage.
Minimum 24 hrs guaranteed with regular usage.
2 battery life lasts long a full 24 hours for moderate to heavy usage.
5 days easily on moderate usage.
3  3000 mah user replacable battery is enough to last a whole day with moderate to heavy usage.
Battery backup is decent it will last upto 24 hours for an average usage.
1 complete day on heavy usage 
4 hours of continuous usage.
with all my above usage it last for 2 full days   16 GB memory   i also purchased the 32 GB microsd card for Rs 500  and 5.
After one week of heavy usage i am happy that I made a very good choice.
After a heavy usage the charge remains almost 1 full day.
Handle almost daily usage like fb whatsapp etc.
--------------------------------------------------------
looks  25
Looks really premium in hand.
Looks nice from any angle
Looks awesome and so is the build quality.
 Looks good  nice Zen UI  Awesome battery life  easily lasts a day .
Looks are sleek and sophisticated.
Overall looks are elegant but Asus need to work far more to make phone performance wise good .
2  Looks and feels very nice sturdy and premium  uncommon design.
Stylish  sleek  looks expensive  performance is exceptionally good for a phone under 10k.
good in looks in hands and in features.
good looks .
phone feel sturdy and solid with great looks.
Initially  I was rather happy to have made a good selection as the phone has really stylish looks and great features.
Its looks are royal.
looks nice  battery backup is average  camera is good but not best.
It good really good looks.
Amazing looks.
looks are very good for a 10k phone 5 5. display quality is very good and smooth.
nd the best part is its good looks.
Looks stylish.
--------------------------------------------------------
good features  23
And also creating a Snapshot account is also good features.
Phone is awesome full of features quality is also good 
SO  in all  this phone s very good  UI also full of great features  but  hardware assembly by manufacturer at final stage is very very poor  I think they do not have post assembly check stage or say Quality check.
And features are good.
Initially  I was rather happy to have made a good selection as the phone has really stylish looks and great features.
 Perfect mobile it has good features front camera and back camera is also two good 
and battery back up is good as well as the camera features are also good.
Good performance  battery backup is above average and good  taking a bit more time to charge 100  few good features inbuilt like smart lock  no issue faced with proximity sensors.
Phone Features is good.
good camera quality with nice features .
Good features for this mobile.
Other features is good .
Asus Zenfone 2 Laser is best phone in this price series and good features.
Overall if someone is looking for a good budget phone with above positive features then this is a must buy.
Good features and good battery.
Phone has good features in it.
It has all the good features of a high end phone for a very good price.
Budget friendly price  good features  good lookings and overall good phone.
Otherwise other features are working good  camera specification is exaggerated  but its good for 10k and touch and battery till now is working fine.
good look and features overall.
 This Asus phone has very good features.
 Cool phone with good features  Didn t have any problems till now.
 Good phone with nice features especially in the 10k budget .
 Good features for budget
It has very good features and will give a run for money.
all Features are good.
 Good features  fast 4G LTE processor and 2 GB RAM give smooth performance.
The matte finish material really looks stealthy  battery wise  very happy display and color rendition very good  very good camera with very good features and modes for different occasions  very light n asus well in your hand and your pocket 
Perfect mobile for regular use with good features.
Performance is also good and screen display and features are awesome
Apart from this  the phone has really good features  a great battery and the Customized Zen UI is really smooth and easy to use.
Awesome phone with good features.
--------------------------------------------------------
experience  17
Again a royal touch experience.
Overall very good experience with this mobile.
The phone however exhibits no lag and had been a wonderful experience using this device and there are features that you ll just love and never get bored.
It has been an awesome experience till now.
So overall its a very bad experience with this device.
All its characteristics and specs just Coincide to give the user the most joyful experience.
the gameplay experience was awesome  no lags  no heat up  battery percent dropping is really minimum.
 from the 5 months experience it is awesome.
However this most recent experience with Flipkart has been very disappointing both in terms of their pricing and customer service.
kart and it was an awesome experience.
 I have been using this phone since more than one month and the experience is very nice.
lag free experience .
However overall good experience.
 First time experience is good.
awesome experience.
Nice experience with ASUS ZenUI.
Excellent product in terms of battery life and touch experience.
So it is low but not so low obviosuly you can hear the ringtones in the same room  P and every one have their secondary phone specially for calling purpose you just have to buy cool headset and you will love it while you watching movies or video I m a bass lover   m not like those who willing to listen soft clarity like sound I have used Sony s XB450  nw XB70  in ear  is my daily driver and was also played some music videos to check the quality of sound thru this device and i had same experience with it so in headset department totally impressed.
It delivers you a smooth experience no heating issues whatsoever and never lags at all.
Awesome experience.
1 front camera is excellent you can also use beautification mode for better experience
Best Android experience.
Using kindle app for reading book was a very good experience  and the difference between 720p and 1080p never affected readability.
Gaming experience is great on this device.
Pathetic experience.
experience so far is good.
ZenUI feature rich and smooth experience.
this phone camera mega pixel is very very very bad but iam loss my money it is my personal experience 
you have place to share about your mobile experience.
range phone with a better experience while changing over from Lumia 8.
so nice experience in gaming.
1  Large HD display with better view angles which deliver best experience for browsing  map navigation  gaming  watching movies  reading pdf.
amazing experience.
--------------------------------------------------------
zen ui  15
Zen ui is the best.
layer option in zen ui is great   if you dosent like appdrawer type ui then you can swith to single layer ui like MIUI.
and zen ui is smooth no issues on that
 Looks good  nice Zen UI  Awesome battery life  easily lasts a day .
2 with a customized asus zen ui which is great to use.
Stand by time is excellent due to Zen UI.
No heating problem  no hanging problem   ZEN UI is excellent.
Everything goes great with few lags at times just need few updates to be even more efficient but zen ui should be alot more good looking esp caller screens 
Many People in the reviews had said that its has unnessary apps but if they were new to zen ui they had to know that app icons were only shortcuts to system settings.
Very Good ZEN UI and easy handling
Zen UI  8 10  is good.
ZenUI is the best UI which is user friendly and easy to operate.
It has an awesome cameras good display premium look smooth touch android 5 will be upgradable to android6 superb UI Zen UI too many useful preinstalled apps.
Zen UI   Apps  Zen UI is very very good.
Zen UI is best in customization
asus zen UI is too good.
Apart from this  the phone has really good features  a great battery and the Customized Zen UI is really smooth and easy to use.
Coming to the ZEN UI now and oh God  Is this the best UI in the world or what.
the Zen UI is a good one.
Go ahead if you love ZEN UI   other options like OTG  2 GB RAM  128GB external memory options.
2  Zen UI is intuitive.
--------------------------------------------------------
little bit  -14
1  Display is great for the price little bit reflective when viewed outside
Super phone but handling is little bit difficult compare 5 inch phones 
When you update software in this mobile  little bit of hot on backside.
 This mobile is feeling little bit big   features is average .
But i little bit disappoint With front camera.
little bit heating problem.
I am little bit sad with quality of the primary camera  which is not so good despite having 13 MP camera.
But the pictures captured in low light settings appear to be little bit grainy.
But little bit noisy in indoor lights  please help if any one came across this issue with solutions   
9 10  could have been a little bit better 
But little bit hitting problem is there and when I call someone abnormal sound is heard before the call gets connected.
But a little bit afraid of its heating problem 
Only con is speaker is a little bit low but call quality is awesome and too much clear as compared to samsung grand.
volume rocker key is at back so little bit uncomfortable.
Yes the speaker output is a little bit low but it can be improved.
The device getting little bit heat while on continuous use.
Sound is decent but little bit low.
--------------------------------------------------------
bad_speaker  -14
3 Very low speaker volume   This is a problem   and one that has no easy solution.
Some times it founds low speaker volume but overall performance was totally good 
Except Loud Speaker sound  its not good  
6. mobile speaker is overall average good not too bad  ear speaker is very nice clarity 7 10 
if you are intellect engough to increase the voulme in audio wizard app thne its the loudest speaker in the price range.
Only speaker is not that great and it is on bottom of the phone behind so for call with speaker it is not that great and sound you can feel that it is away from you.
have to turn the speaker on so i can speak to the person on other side and vice versa.
though loud speaker is nt so good bt it is bttr nd louder compared to zenfone 5. many people may first find that the RAM usage is more.
4  External speaker sound is feeble.
You can buy those small speaker and use it with the phone.
the only disadvantage is low speaker volume.
--------------------------------------------------------
nice speakers  13
Also the speaker is not very loud.
Speaker is very good
When i read reviews of this phone earlier some people were complaing that the phone speaker is not that loud as in other phones  but here i am assuring you phone has pretty loud speaker.
4. loud speaker superb sound guys here also every one says it s not loud.
Speaker sound is not that high like a loud micromax phone but no disappointment  since it a phone and not a loud speaker.
People have confusion as Phone doesn t sounds good  It sounds Good You can easily get Ring Tone Sound  You can Listen to music on Loud speaker and its good enough in 16.
As of now there are no issues but hearing from friends saying that the speaker might go faulty if it gets old.
Samsung Galaxy Grand 2 has a better speaker phone volume when used for CALLS.
could have a better speaker
6. mobile speaker is overall average good not too bad  ear speaker is very nice clarity 7 10 
good speaker sound.
--------------------------------------------------------
volume  -12
Still you think volume is low  are you making any DJ party with phone  If you think volume is less in Ring  get a Trouble Enhanced Rings in Wav Mp3.
Ring tone volume is very low.
When you use speaker phone  ONLY FOR CALLS  Volume is low.
5  speaker volume is a little low.
2 The sound is decent not average Ring volume is high enough You have tweak the sound using the sound wizard app and most your worries is solved
It gets a little heated around volume button while using camera.
end games  nice battery life but speaker volume is very low you have adjust settings to gaming in asus audio wizard then volume increases slightly.
low volumes  in spite of audio wizard  the volume is just too low  you will miss out on calls in traffic  festivals  etc  Since I have not worked on Android Lollipop before  its difficult to figure out what is Asus UI   what is inherently Android.
Loudspeaker volume is not so good 
Other review i saw some guys are mentioned volume problem  i used this phone more than 24 hours really superb volume.
Playback volume is not as loud as compared to other brands like lenovo.
And yes the volume is little less else its a vey nice phone to buy.
You need to adjust the bass treble and volume to make it little louder.
The back volume rocker.
Volume is Good Enough Not like china loud speaker mobile 
While playing music and videos volume is superb.
Volume is sufficient enough for my tastes.
--------------------------------------------------------
heating issue  -10
Little heating problem below 30  battery.
from such a low cost phone  Isn t it actually amazing  no a miracle  how they managed to squeeze in such mid range specs in under 10 000  If you wanted a phone with   Super fast performance  best gaming  no heating  excellent battery   etc.
Except for minor heating problem the phone is a good option 
Have not faced any heating issue even when multitasking.
I got the Asus zenfone 2 ZE550ML 16gb with 2 gigs of RAM but it was returned due to severe heating issues.
I read some Old review about it s Proximity sensor that it stops working but there was no such problem when i check my Device also there is no any other issue about this product no heating at all ALSO after continuous 2.
 firstly i like to buy k3 note but due to out of stock from many days i ordered this phone and now i am so happy by using this product without any problem and far better than k3 note no heating issue good display good ram very good battery performance good camera quality smooth touch and zero lag.
After using for 8 days continuously  the phone still works in the same speed  no slow down  no flaws  no heating issues and absolutely no software issues.no heating  12
Nice and fast delivery packing was nice and good it phone is nice it working good no heating problem camera is nice in this price   
from such a low cost phone  Isn t it actually amazing  no a miracle  how they managed to squeeze in such mid range specs in under 10 000  If you wanted a phone with   Super fast performance  best gaming  no heating  excellent battery   etc.
No hang no heating issue .
No heating issue.
I got the Asus zenfone 2 ZE550ML 16gb with 2 gigs of RAM but it was returned due to severe heating issues.
Very good display  no heating issue  good battery life  smooth touch screen   above all excellent camera.
no heating issue  clear sound.
nd there was no heating issue.
Very nice good looking and performance no heating very good to catch and extra battery performance no issues frm 6mnth 
Does any1 have a heating issue with this mobile .
--------------------------------------------------------
design  12
3  what a sleek design.
2  Looks and feels very nice sturdy and premium  uncommon design.
and the design is top.
 Very good design  light weight  royal black screen look   
2 5  for poor design.
only bad thing it takes too long time for charging and sometimes i feel design is good but body built is not strong .
design is good  and specially balck color has leather touch at back   so it does not slide from hand.
1. awesome design and display.
Which was again not a great design but it was tolerable.
 A very good mobile under 10K neat design and easy to hold and excellent battery backup and camera too.
Working good but I don t like this design and after a long use of phone it s hanging then I hard resetted the phone then it starts working fine 
1 awesome design and display
Design is excellent
 Awesome features  connectivity and body design  with good  not best  gaming performance.
5. look and design is very great 8 10.
Design is too good.
5  the curved design  easily manageable in single hand 
Sleek and  sexy  design.
 Superior finish design and stylish.
The first thing that catches one s eye is the beautiful design of the phone.
5 is too big for me  but the curved and slim design will make up that issue.
Phone design is really good.
6  Design   not too heavy not too large.
the best phone under 10k  nice touch  beautiful design  good battery life  beautiful designed.
Design is superb not orthodox design.
 Classic phone with great design performance is not up to mark but it is very good camera is also good 
--------------------------------------------------------
months  -11
Very rare but happened at least 5 times in last 6 months  call dropped all of a sudden.
I am using Zenfone laser 2 for the last 3 months and I am very much happy with the product.
 Have been using last 6 months and am a heavy user with around 8 hours of back to back calls.
Using since last two months  didn t find any cons till now.
 Awesome phone camera quality is very nice using from past 5 months 
working well since last 2 months 
It was good as I brought it but now after 6 months  nothing works good with the phone  sensor  camera  response everything is sad  my friend who was using this phone warned me not to get this  but I dint listen to him  now I repent  do not buy Asus product  I will never again  
Because i am using last 6 months and awesome.
using from last 5 months no problem faced till now.
2 months back which I am quite happy with.
 Hi I have been using this phone for the last 3 months.
I have been using from past 10 months  till now no problem at all.
 Using this phone for last 6 7 months  no such big issues.
Am using this mobile since 6 months.
I have been using this for past 10 months and I havent had any heating issues with phone.
Using from last 4 months cool phone problem is in calling but other all feature are perfect 
Using for last 4 months 
I have been using this mobile since 3 months.
5 months  i am 100  satisfied with this mobile.
--------------------------------------------------------
high end games  10
 Already used that product for last 2 months  does not faced any problem till now though i used this set for lots of files download or playing some high end game battery back up really nice  camera quality is awesome  only problem i face is that there should be a volume button outside to be used during any music playing  otherwise for general user it s a very useful under 10K bucks.
Mobile games is not hang 
Basic games like Subway Surfers  Temple Run 2  Candy Crush Soda and Saga  Sniper X  Unkilled  Dream League Soccer  all these running butter smoothly.
end games  nice battery life but speaker volume is very low you have adjust settings to gaming in asus audio wizard then volume increases slightly.
Though it has no problem playing heavy games.
As I mentioned about it s RAM optimization in the cons section  the good thing is the phone doesn t lag at all and its pretty fast  I m playing Asphalt 8 and few other games without any issue.
It has all the good features of a high end phone for a very good price.
NO lagging at all  i don t use any heavy games or apps 
I also updated my device to latest firmware manually as soon as I received the device  and after upgrading Installing some high end games like FIFA 15 Ultimate Team  Asphalt 8 Airborn  Need For Speed .
Casual games run without any issue high end games are running smoothly too games such as gt racing 2 fifa and other high end games ran without any problem tried asphalt 8 in high graphics works without any lag but i wd recommend one to play the game in medium graphics works even better.
The only 3 things which i saw took battery was the inbuilt camera app due to laser  when you use net via sim card and very very heavy games  P 
no lagging while playing heavy games
The phone looks like a high end version one and feels nice in hands.
Some high end games like Real Racing 2  Dead Trigger 2  Modern Combat 5  Asphalt 8  played at medium settings  FIFA 15 running smoothly but some lag is noticeable.
Even on playing basic games like Subway Surfer the phone heats up.
i am not much into games.
And the device is optimized very nicely  always getting more than 700 MB RAM free  although 30 apps are installed in the phone including some are inbuilt apps and high end games.
9  1GB free RAM is enough for multi tasking   10 GB usable internal storage is enough for storing many high end games or large applications.
I have used high end phones from known brands but none of them never made
I don t play many heavy games  but I keep playing some games  like candy crush  continuously  sometime for hours .
Class phone with all the features of high end phone  very good battery back up.
By such a experience i would like to experience high end phones of asus in the future.
Camera can take pics as good as any high end phone camera.
The device is seamless and out performs most of my basic and even high end requirements .
Many people find Snapdragon 410 as a con but for me it feels good because it use less power than other high end processors and the processor isnt bad either.
Asus has provided good phone with high end configuration I have purchased this in BIG APP sale on 21 .
 Battery backup is pretty decent with Asphalt8 and HALO3 and other high end games.
Also it does not support to some mobile games.
4 hrs continuous songs   whatsapp  fb   heavy games like asphalt 8  dead trigger.
some times hanging when playing heavy games and heavy apps smart display .
Supports memory card upto 128GB  but presently i am using 64GB card to download high end games.
Gaming  tried some heavy games and its runs very smoothly.
Im not a gaming person so for small games it work fine.
on playing games continuously it last 14.
2 GHz clocked Snapdragon 410 processor   450 MHz clocked Adreno 306 GPU is capable enough to run high end games without heating issues   also battery efficient.
Gaming is absolutely amazing casual games run without any issue high end games are running smoothly too games such as gt racing 2 fifa and other high end games ran without any problem tried asphalt 8 in high graphics works without any lag but i wd recommend one to play the game in medium graphics works even better.
Camera clarity is good and the processor does not hang while playing heavy games like asaphalt or even while multitasking.
Last but not the least at all  the games  if are supported by it  yep its not a gaming beast you would like it to be  due to low processor speed  will run so smooth and the device doesn t heat up or just only heats up to around 37  which is normal.
I am not going to talk of some features like 2 GB RAM  as it works great in multitaksing  and in heavy games apps  Sound Quality  as it is simply good and do the task without any problem  16 GB internal memory  as you get sufficient for your images and apps .
1GB free RAM space without any installation of apps  though you can block unwanted apps by clicking auto start manager which is the best i say  got 2 updates with in a week  one z of 540 mb and 430 mb wich are helpful and added more features like laser scale and additional power saving modes  phone doesn t heat at all even playing games like temple run subway surf.
High end games go sweet without any bitter  lag  No lags No bugs with the performance and ZenUI.
5 inch screen  I found it like 5 inch but otherwise it offers lot of features that any high end phone offers 
Gets heated up upon playing heavy games.
Sp 410 chipset is good for casual games but not for heavy games.
Able to play high end games in high graphics mode.
--------------------------------------------------------
double tap  -9
Double Tap to Lock and Unlock
Zenmotion   zen gestures like double tap to sleep wakeup is a killer.
1. power button they have placed in the top  which is little difficult to use still the phone have the double tap options.
No backlight for home and other buttons but double tap to wakup is there so not a big issue  
There are many features like Zen Motion and double tap.
Good phone  no heating issues  camera is ok  performance is good  double tap screen is good  
this mobile gives feature of double tap wake up and lock but now double tap wake up is not working.
Like the double tap to wake and sleep feature.
7  Double tap to wake up and lock feature spares the pressing of the power button.
Though power button is at the top  No Prob  There is Double tap to Wake   Sleep
Double TAP to wake up phone.
some time my double tap to unlock does not work properly 8 .
Overall this phone is a beast  has a superb battery backup  got lot many features like the double tap wake up  gorilla glass 4and lot many feature that you don t get in costly mobiles in price range of 20 000 like the new Moto X Play I have bought this phone recently from flipkart .
Double tap wake.
the phone have big bazzles which make the phone little uncomfortable  specially while unlocking but thanks to the double tap options it make it easy  
I sleeps on time and wake up quickly with a double tap on screen.
The proximity sensor and double tap function maynot work.
Double tap to wake up and sleep is very useful.
I liked the ZenUI because ZenUI offers functionality like double tap to wake  gestures which are very useful   also I haven t found any bug yet.
Double tap to wakeup is another useful feature.
K3 note doesnt have application control and double tap feature
Double tap to screen off and double tap to screen on is an advantage.
Double tap is not working sometimes.
--------------------------------------------------------
value for money  8
I recommend this to all who searching for a high value for money smart phone.
I would like to point out only the solution for the cons that people said here about this 5 5 rated phone for Value for money  best specification  and Light weight design.
And great value for u r money .
best value for money 
 I expected maximum value for money by buying this  phone performs just average.
A true value for money phone   
Especially the SAR value is also good compared to Lenovo K3 note and motoG which comes in the similar prices.
SAR Value is very low compared with other branded phones.
It is ok  value for money.
Bought this phone in mid of November initially i found it a good and value for money but as days passes by few cons turned out camera is not at all good even the phone gets hangs alot or even take alot of time to open the picture u clicked which is really a very irritating.
4. good value for money paid.
But this device in real life performance is just exponential in terms of pure looks  feel usage   value for money.
 It is a good product to the value its very nice to purchase.
Complete value for money.
It is real value for money and It won t disspoint you.
overall value for money no heating issues or lag so far.
If you re still confused then just go for it because it s full value for each rupee you spend.
This budget Phone is an expression for better quality than quantity  at a very high value to money ratio  that I haven t seen since the era of grand daddy of mobiles  who sold their company to someone who literally killed them.
OVERALL VALUE FOR MONEY PRODUCT 
Ultimately it is an awesome value for money package.
--------------------------------------------------------
feel  8
Pricing is awesome  5 5 ratings for that  It is far better than it s competitors like Lenovo K3 which has below average camera and high sar value  and ASUS in this price range gives a premium feel considering the back over and gorilla glass which k3 doesn t have
Doesn t feel heavy.
1 Aesthetics look and feel are just great
Phone is great  awesome  good ui  display  no lag  very smooth feel good in hand.
Touch   Feel Quality is Ossum 
Look n feel is good.
Cons  Bit Heavy  buy premium feel scores well.
look and feel is good.
--------------------------------------------------------
pre installed apps  -8
I browse  chat  text  whatsapp  email  download and check documents  shop on mobile apps  shop online  heavy user of MS One Note  and all with sync.
otherwise everything is ok. camera is gud  it has some preinstalled apps due to which it becomes slow.
Once again  to be fair  some apps do have utility.
You get New feature notification inside each Zen UI apps also to easily find what is new.  
But why ASUS has added many useless apps .
We dont need those useless apps.
9 apps open 
However the apps are of very good quality  compared to similar paid apps so lots of savings there  and majority can be easily uninstalled.
I wasted my money in terms huge amount of 3G cellular data for various apps.
Battery back up with mobile data ON  calling hours of almost 6 hours  restricting background data for unwanted apps running is  32 hours for a full charge which is much better.
This mobile gives zen  Auto start manger  app to manage unwanted apps loaded into the RAM when we not using them.
 ASUS has provided various pre installed apps   all of them has great utility specially apps for camera 
A lot of preinstalled unwanted apps reducing the actual phone memory to 10 GB intead of 16 GB.
1. there are so many pre loaded apps which may not necessary
You keep getting new features with frequent apps udpates.
some times hanging when playing heavy games and heavy apps smart display .
and then they dont let us remove their ugly apps .
4. internal apps are more.
We can remove disable the unwanted apps pre.
you can unistall third party apps but asus apps you cannot  and these apps are worth too  the software is easy to use  have enough options except some features like flip to silent.
Asus apps are very nice.
3  unnecessarily apps are updated which makes a memory wastage.
Available internal memory is less than specified due to inbuilt apps of approx.
Multitasking handling is great  as most of my games and apps were running in background while i was doing other processes like copying files  installing new apps  running an app or game  multitasking was buttery smooth  I was getting free of 500MB of RAM while all these processes.
No need of separate apps for some requirements.
1GB free RAM space without any installation of apps  though you can block unwanted apps by clicking auto start manager which is the best i say  got 2 updates with in a week  one z of 540 mb and 430 mb wich are helpful and added more features like laser scale and additional power saving modes  phone doesn t heat at all even playing games like temple run subway surf.
3. lots of unwanted apps
Asus ads   many small apps are a pain.
ASUS has provided various pre installed apps   all of them has great utility specially apps for camera  5 5 ratings for that 
--------------------------------------------------------
in low light  -7
Medium speaker volume  Average camera performance in low light.
You can also take good pics in low light.
But the Camera is not good very noisy in low light.
No back light for home and other buttons.
indoor and low light areas not ok.
Decent pictures in low light .
pic is Ok when taking in low light.
2  Camera quality in low light is grainy.
During sunlight the pictures are top notch but at low light always grainy.
Hence the other colours also have slight creamish light yellowish shades.
 great camera quality even in low light good battery back up no heating issue untill now.
its truly awsome  good camera quality even in low light good battery backup no heating issue till now.
camera focus is great in low light but some time blury images.
d Notification LED is very basic and produces only red and green light.
4  Very good rear camera   have compared against Mi4i   Galaxy J7 and HTC 826   Asus wins hands down on bright as well as low light photography.
4 5  not so good in low light .
although the laser is not as spectacular as expected and low light images are not that pleasant to look at always.
while ASUS is stable  awesome UI  camera take awesome picture in low light.
But I feel that camera is a bit on the downside in artificial lighting but in natural light the photos come out to be excellent.
 some noise creeps in low light 
Low light pics are very bad.
Good camera quality even in low light good battery back up no heating issue till now.
I still don t like front camera as front camera works great only in good light.
One major drawback was no led light for navigation buttons  during night we have to assume and touch the screen for back home buttons.
Camera captures quality pictures but can find noises in low light .
Camera not good in deem light but also in artificial light.
OK Camera for low light .
good camera quality even in low light good battery back up no heating issue till now.
Front cam pics with 5MP is also good  only under good light .
I rarely used camera seriously i am not the right guy to tell you about this category but i clicked some pictures twas descent  sort of noise found when you take this picture in low light or in an artificial lights but over all not a bad camera i would say 
Would have given 5 out of 5 if  front camera would have been working in low light also.
Camera is average specially in low light.
Low light pic taking capability is also very good.
Low light images are granny and have noise.
Camera  On most occasions  the camera did give good to average pics especially with ample light .
Camera is average at low light but Perfect Outdoor.
If you are looking for a budget phone and loves to play games  browsing and camera in low light is not your priority than this phone is made for you 
Rear camera is doing good job in low light.
--------------------------------------------------------
internal memory  7
7  The user space in internal memory is about 10 GB which is quite satisfactorily 
The obb can be moved to sd card but first it has to be in internal memory and you can move it through settings only.
Good Internal Memory and RAM which gives good access time.
Available internal memory is less than specified due to inbuilt apps of approx.
found it very good  good camera  good internal memory  otg support  easy interfaces  
11  10 GB free internal memory   total 16 GB  .
gr8 features like 2gb ram n 16gb internal memory 
--------------------------------------------------------
a long time  -6
only bad thing it takes too long time for charging and sometimes i feel design is good but body built is not strong .
 I have spent a long time searching in the 10k range before deciding on this one.
Heating issue like others mentioned happens for me only when I am charging the phone  playing games for long time  and running Adobe Draw for long time  I cant call it a heating problem at all.
Opening of previous images is taking very long time.
Initially saw some reviews regarding low loudspeaker sound  however since I have used iphones for a long time I am used to it.
battery runs for a much longer time.
Charging takes longer time due to 3000 mah battery.
The phone doesn t heat up while gaming or doing any heavy work except using the camera for a long time.
Gets little warm when using the camera for a long time.
Last but not the least   PHONE IS NOT HEATING AT ALL after playing Candy Crush   Subway Surfer for long time.
Takes a long time to charge up almost 2.
Sorry ASUS  Waited a long time for the zenfone only to be gravely disappointed.
--------------------------------------------------------
quad core processor  6
A fast and reliable processor.
Last but not the least at all  the games  if are supported by it  yep its not a gaming beast you would like it to be  due to low processor speed  will run so smooth and the device doesn t heat up or just only heats up to around 37  which is normal.
Processor is good
processor also good
The snapdragon 410 chipset is bit old so ASUS could provide a better processor.
Too many apps  the phone gets stuck and it s processor is slow 
5 inch  great processor etc.
Processor is good 4 5   
processor is a little slow.
Processor is good for my level  I don t play Asphalt 8 in this mobile  I feel less satisfied only with sound  even this is good.
core processor is so slow.
but processor is bit slow as it is a 1.
If you want a good camera phone with a decent processor in the 10k range this is the best money can buy you.
I am regretting my decision as this phone hangs a lot despite having a good processor.
Processor is great working without lag .
2GB Ram 16GB ROm   the processor quite good
Its also 64 bit processor  but less heating  less battery consumption.
good processor  it has snapdragon quadcore .
good processor 
--------------------------------------------------------
viewing angles  6
Viewing angles are wide  but not that much.
5in hd display  the viewing angles are great and the display is crisp.
viewing angles are great almost up to 179 degree.
The display is awesome as it is crisp and the viewing angles are also good  asus says its 178 deg .
It has greater viewing angles i. e. 178 degrees perhaps.
And the viewing angles are also great.
--------------------------------------------------------
upper limits  6
Lenovo models were good but beware  their SAR  Radiation  levels are high and just within the prescribed upper limits.
--------------------------------------------------------
lenovo k3 note  -5
9999 to my flipkart wallet account on same day when they took by defective K3 note.
Its better than lenovo k3 note   all other smartphones under 10000.
 firstly i like to buy k3 note but due to out of stock from many days i ordered this phone and now i am so happy by using this product without any problem and far better than k3 note no heating issue good display good ram very good battery performance good camera quality smooth touch and zero lag.
The phone is very nice better than the K3 note 
For e. g. k3 note got famous due to FHD screen Yureka due to cyanogen and OP1 like above category specs in budget segment etc.
 the mobile is nice compared to 10k range and camera quality is also good   better than k3 note and other fones  if u like it thn go for it but before buying go for full review in youtube 
overall camera quality is more effective than Lenovo K3 Note and the laser works better speed focusing.
NOW K4 NOTE  yes I agree Performance wise K4 note can be good   there s something call stability and perfection  and that s what ASUS is all about  belive me every ASUS is just something to spend upon.
In conclusion i can say that except ui and customization  in terms of system response time lenovo is good in every respect.
Much better than Lenovo   Mi.
10K if the camera is your priority  but for anything else  you would be better off with the Lenovo K2 Note.
--------------------------------------------------------
zenfone 2 laser  5
After using asus zenfone for last 3 days i observed that phone performance is very good.
My experience with Zenfone 2 is not good.
The several ASUS apps within the zenfone that connect you to other people actually connect you only to other zenfone users.
I have Three No s of this Asus Zenfone laser 550KL mobile working good compare to Asus old models
This is my second Zenfone.
But the signal strength on the zenfone 2 Laser is horrible to say the least.
costs 3k bucks higher than the zenfone 2 laser smaller 5 inch display stock android experience customization is not possible lesser battery life and poor camera performance compared to zenfone 2 laser.
The second ZenFone laser I bought.
It was mentioned by the seller that tentative release of this phone is 16th sep and delivery will be done by 21st or 23rd but the best part is that i got this sexy zenfone on 15th sept. 1.
although the laser is not as spectacular as expected and low light images are not that pleasant to look at always.
My experience with Asus Zenfone2 Laser is great because it s the only phone available in market which fulfills all my requirements.
Sorry ASUS  Waited a long time for the zenfone only to be gravely disappointed.
Above review It is true of zenfone 2 laser and also for zenfone max.
ASUS ZenFone wonderful product and clipart delivers it nicely 
but facing camera problem because of new laser technology.
But then i have seen a lot of review videos and finally came to the conclusion that Asus zenfone 2 laser is the Best of all.
Believe me this phone Zenphone 2 laser is far more stable and smooth.
the Zenfone 5 was brilliant and used it for one year with no problem  but this one is a pain.
2  Connectivity issues  I dont know if this is a global zenfone issue or specific to the piece I ordered.
Asus should have emphasized more on camera quality than to introduce the crappy laser AF .
bought this Zenfone2 Laser with double minded.
Over all Asus zenfone 2 laser is Good.
--------------------------------------------------------
works  5
works absolutely nice.
5 from 8 to 9 months with all applications and its works fabulous no battery drain no hanging etc .
High setting  works fine  Medium  Great  
But as compared to moto and lenovo its good camera and larger works well.
--------------------------------------------------------
gaming  4
But yeah it feels very slight warm during intensive gaming.
5. best gaming performance
i love Asus zenfone for good gaming.
ASUS ZENUI is absolutely amazing good gaming experience all in all worthy product in my opinion.
2 GHz quad core processor  the gaming is average.
--------------------------------------------------------
delivery of flipkart  4
Really appreciate Flipkart for so proper and systematic and fastest Delivery of my each product.
Flipkart delivery is awesome and hats off to asus 
delivery of flipkart is quite good.
 I m very much excited to see the fastest delivery of Flipkart
have pre ordered this phone and I must mention that overall order fulfillment and delivery of Flipkart is very good.
I have pre ordered this phone through flipkart and I must mention that overall order fulfillment and delivery of Flipkart is just awesome.
 I have pre ordered this phone through flipkart and I must mention that overall order fulfillment and delivery of Flipkart is just awesome.
--------------------------------------------------------
android  4
getting updates but didnt get the latest android yet 
It has an awesome cameras good display premium look smooth touch android 5 will be upgradable to android6 superb UI Zen UI too many useful preinstalled apps.
ZenUI   Its the best Customized Android UI  i have ever used  lots and lots of useful features.
I had a Lumia earlier and this is my first Android phone  and even with all the horsepower  android seems to hang more.
No hesitation recommending it to mature users who want a decent android smartphone experience.
 Those who are buying their first android phone  they must buy it.
--------------------------------------------------------
pros and cons  4
This phone is really good in all ways if u wanna point out the pros and cons there is a little.
Pros Good design
1  Low sound but acceptable writing this under cons just because i dont want to leave it empty  P  
Sound yes as i mention earlier its not up to the mark This is seriously doesn t matter to me 90  ppl nw use headset and they are the best in every sound department i hd to write some cons so i hv written this fr the public purpose hope it helps 
Cons  but adjustable for me 
There is no any major cons in this phone.
no other cons I found in this phone.
Pros  Good battery back up.
--------------------------------------------------------
dead trigger  -3
Games like asphalt 8 and dead trigger 2 ran smoothly.
Some high end games like Real Racing 2  Dead Trigger 2  Modern Combat 5  Asphalt 8  played at medium settings  FIFA 15 running smoothly but some lag is noticeable.
4 hrs continuous songs   whatsapp  fb   heavy games like asphalt 8  dead trigger.
The processor 8 10  is above average and till now i haven t experienced any sort of lag or heating asphalt 8  dead trigger .
--------------------------------------------------------
laser auto focus  3
ASUS ZenUI provides many built in apps  like Auto Start Manager  which helps prevent auto.
Good camera  becomes the BEST after a simple auto update.
Phone comes with laser auto focus which works great and you can take selfies in 13 MP instead of 5.
I am not happy with the auto brightness sensor.
Laser autofocus helps you to clk amazing pics with fast focus.
front selfe camera is amazingly good with auto beauty correction features.
Quick and accurate auto.
camera is very nice quick auto focus using laser.
This mobile gives zen  Auto start manger  app to manage unwanted apps loaded into the RAM when we not using them.
--------------------------------------------------------
hanging problem  -3
As soon I updated the phone  I noticed a remarkable change in the Camera quality.
--------------------------------------------------------
go for asus  -3
Camera performance is above good but not excellent  ASUS need to improve on that  3.
Camera performance is above good but not excellent  ASUS need to improve 
--------------------------------------------------------
power  -3
Focussing methods other phones use is image processing based but here it is laser based and due to this  CPU power is not much used and battery power is preserved.
 very nice phone with all features under rs10000 and after software updating battery power discharging quickly other than that very nice and user friendly and also im waiting for purchase another one when they give promotional offer 
you dont have to put the power key everytime to wake up your phone.
Many people find Snapdragon 410 as a con but for me it feels good because it use less power than other high end processors and the processor isnt bad either.
1  The battery backup is poor  the battery power gets drain very fast
Though the battery is just 3000 mAh   the phone can still last for more than a day provided one uses it smartly by toggling into power saver and super power saver mode while the data is not required .
The Battery gets drained even in super power saver mode.
--------------------------------------------------------
user  3
 Already used that product for last 2 months  does not faced any problem till now though i used this set for lots of files download or playing some high end game battery back up really nice  camera quality is awesome  only problem i face is that there should be a volume button outside to be used during any music playing  otherwise for general user it s a very useful under 10K bucks.
I browse  chat  text  whatsapp  email  download and check documents  shop on mobile apps  shop online  heavy user of MS One Note  and all with sync.
5 ZenUI i. best user friendly and easy to operate
User friendly   superb features.
Display is good  user interface is superb
I am a moderate user and it seems to fulfill all the needs.
I need to buy a new phone for other reasons and I was checking for a phone which will give me a similar user friendly experience.
I am a moderate user.
I am a Asus product user from last five years and Asus never fails to prove Itself in terms of performance.
For an average user with Moderate internet usage  the full battery stands for 2 days and even for a heavy user it should stand for a day.
And if you are a moderate user then it lasts up.
Good ram but not for very heavy user i use more app its slightly slow for me.
that shouldn t concern an average user.
Atlast  its beautiful User nterface ZenUI  will make you to forget its specifications while using it.
i am a moderate user and this will be easily from 8.
Battery backup is more than enough for one day for above average user.
 Have been using last 6 months and am a heavy user with around 8 hours of back to back calls.
Not low as mentioned here many user
user available ROM  10.
The camera  speed   crisp display make the user happy .
If you are a heavy user the battery lasts up.
The battery back up is awesome  almost 2 days of backup for basic user in power saving mode.
Listen and then confirm if the other user is online.
--------------------------------------------------------
hours  -3
Battery backup is decent it will last upto 24 hours for an average usage.
2. amazing battery life lasts long a full 24 hours for moderate to heavy usage.
 Battery backup is what i love it will last for more than 24 hours
all are good but it takes around 3 hours to full charge.
And in high performance mode  almost 28 hours backup  gaming  music  surfing.
2 battery life lasts long a full 24 hours for moderate to heavy usage.
If you surf 3G it would last for efficient 10 to 12 hours and if only used for calling and texting this it would last you up to 2 days of battery backup.
With Skype calls for 2 hours  i got 0.
--------------------------------------------------------
13 mp  -3
Phone has 13 mp primary shooter with dual tone led flash and laser as phone is being promoted but i don t see any kind of laser effects.
I am little bit sad with quality of the primary camera  which is not so good despite having 13 MP camera.
The 13 mp seems truly not that attractive.
2  A very good 13 mp rear   5 mp selfie camera produces sharp and clear pics.
 1. rare camera 13 mp is bad.
My friend s Honor 4x mobile and Samsung Mobiles with 13 MP same as ASUS zenfone 2 laser has more clarity in the photos when compared with ASUS ZE550KL.
Camera  13 MP Rear and 5 MP front camera.
--------------------------------------------------------
in price range  3
Good at this price range.
 A phone for this price range is ecstatic  I m in love with this phone  no lag  great UI thanks to Asus ZenUI  build quality is amazing  Flipkart delivered it on time  Coming to pro   cons   
Better than octa core phones in same price range.
A good phone for best price  good battery  good in camera quality under this price range.
The looks  Camera  UI  Ram Or gaming performance is quite decent and really great for its price range.
Good one with this price range.
 Overall performance is good compare to other phones in the same range Price .
Excellent product in this price range  very reliable.
Good in that price range
Weight is more compared to other brands within the same price range  little heating problem.
Worth 4 this price range  Good display   average camera and the speed is also quite good.
--------------------------------------------------------
service center  2
Only one service center available in nearer to decan.
Nice Mobile  great camera and good service by service center people.
--------------------------------------------------------
awesome  2
200  satisfied especially battery backup awesome.
7. look is to good awesome
 Awesome touch   butter smooth experience
--------------------------------------------------------
1 5 days  2
Using it for last 15 days.
with all my above usage it last for 2 full days   16 GB memory   i also purchased the 32 GB microsd card for Rs 500  and 5.
This review is only about the truth   I am posting this after continuous 5 days usage 
 after using phone for 15 days i am pretty happy.
I have used the handset for 5 days  and very much satisfied with the quality of the phone.
5 to 2 days decent battery life.
--------------------------------------------------------
amazing  2
It s Amazing good working no any hanging issue Good sound quality It supports OTG good camera quality Totaly it s a Good price worthy mobile in 10000 Thank u flipkart 
It has been a month now I m using this phone working really good amazing Battry life n m in love with its camera 
--------------------------------------------------------
at price range  2
Good at this price range.
Good in that price range
A good phone for best price  good battery  good in camera quality under this price range.
The looks  Camera  UI  Ram Or gaming performance is quite decent and really great for its price range.
 A phone for this price range is ecstatic  I m in love with this phone  no lag  great UI thanks to Asus ZenUI  build quality is amazing  Flipkart delivered it on time  Coming to pro   cons   
Weight is more compared to other brands within the same price range  little heating problem.
--------------------------------------------------------
for 2 days  2
 I ve recieved this mobile 2 days back.
I am easily getting 2 full working days of backup from this battery.
without wifi or internet its battery lasts approx 2 and half days including normal gaming.
I have been using it for 2 days so far i am really satisfied with its perfomance.
73  as used even after cleaning memory and memory boost function and when playing mp4 video files the sound was very low to listen but finally i found one icon on the app Soud EQ we can increase the audio video volume by using this settings  now the sound is far better than samsung J7 battery is getting 2 full days even if full time net using.
stays alert for 2 days once charged full
But it will surely last for 2 days for normal use.
with all my above usage it last for 2 full days   16 GB memory   i also purchased the 32 GB microsd card for Rs 500  and 5.
Finally I bought  Asus Zenfone 2 laser  4 days before i amazed with this performance and features.
It is powered by a Qualcomm Snapdragon 410 chipset  along with 2GB of RAM and a 3000mAh battery which should last you through a regular days usage without
5 to 2 days decent battery life.
12 days and am very much satisfied with it.
If you surf 3G it would last for efficient 10 to 12 hours and if only used for calling and texting this it would last you up to 2 days of battery backup.
The battery back up is awesome  almost 2 days of backup for basic user in power saving mode.
 Got My Phone 2 days back and had been using to the most possible.
 After several days of comparison  I finally decided to by Asus Zenfone 2 Laser.
--------------------------------------------------------
mode  2
take in manual mode it is really good.
I did trouble shooting by starting fone in safe mode  no help.
9. password protected child mode pre installed where individual can define which application kids can use operate
Good camera especially the manual mode .
Although i think it will if you are thinking of serious gaming  graphics in high mode .
1 While I call somebody Or get a call from somebody screen automatically goes in sleep mode   after that  to do any further action like to cut the call or to go to menu etc.
up is good not too good 1fault is that there is front camera no video mode is available.
Booted in safe mode.
but i feel manual mode is not much good.
Cameras have lot of features like skin smoothing effects low light mode perfect zooming.
Kids Mode and Easy Mode Are Great When You Give Your mobile to kids you can swith kids mode if you are giving your mobile to elders you can switch ui to easy mode .
I clicked some images at night using low light mode and it was excellent.
 So much option in camera means beauty mode low light mode depth mode time elapsed mode one touch blur and all extra.
1. good camera both  some people commenting camera is bad for them guys take photo in manual mode u will get awesome quality and super resolution mode it gives more detailing after zooming the photo 
I have tried changing settings also  with manual mode .
Low light shots are good in manual mode.
 While I call somebody Or get a call from somebody screen automatically goes in sleep mode   after that  to do any further action like to cut the call or etc.
Laser focus camera with beautification mode and other useful modes.
build reading mode  which is really excellent.
--------------------------------------------------------
love  1
AWEWOME MOBILE GO FOR IT No doubt no defect bilkul pakka mobile love it 
--------------------------------------------------------
low sar value  -1
Pricing is awesome  5 5 ratings for that  It is far better than it s competitors like Lenovo K3 which has below average camera and high sar value  and ASUS in this price range gives a premium feel considering the back over and gorilla glass which k3 doesn t have
Because of high SAR value issue of Lenovo K3 note.
very low sar value compared to sets like lenovo k3 note
3. very low SAR value  0.
SAR Value is very low compared with other branded phones.
Especially the SAR value is also good compared to Lenovo K3 note and motoG which comes in the similar prices.
I have never seen before in any phone also have low sar value.
And somehow i feel that this phone has a higher SAR value  keeping it close to my sensitive left ear hurts.
i have chosen this over lenovo k3 note because of low SAR value.
For the kids as it has very less SAR Value.
As i have faced all the Hanging  Heating  Slow  Restart etc problem with Sony Xperia 18000 mobile  I decided to go for below 10000 mobile with Good configuration  Good Camera front Back  2GB Ram  min 16 GB ROM  No Heating and very low SAR value mobile.
--------------------------------------------------------
software  -1
3. zen ui software is very nice  software features very great.
 solution  have to root the phone and disable the unwanted software 
Very good software features.
you can unistall third party apps but asus apps you cannot  and these apps are worth too  the software is easy to use  have enough options except some features like flip to silent.
Not spectacular  but it edges out the competions due to better software algorithms.
In mobile screen double tap is LOCK and Unlock function is very nice  software 9 10.
ASUS dont provide a good software update .
bt that can b solved by using various software appss.
the recent software update had made lots of asus zenfone laser 2 calling screen blank.
Received regular software updates 
Good software   hardware.
e The customised software is good and lag free.
device will get warm during software updates only  dont worry about that
After system update u will find some new software.
--------------------------------------------------------
in 10k range  1
and i feel it is the best in 10k range.
--------------------------------------------------------
review  1
Will post a detailed review after a couple of days.
After use of 3 months I must have to change my review due to some problem  my latest review is 
sorry for the late review to ASUS circle .
So that s it  if you think this review helpful support me and my YouTube channel  TheMobileShots .
This is an honest review coming from a guy who loves to test the gadgets to the limits.
Here I am going to write a true review about the ASUS Zenfone 2 Laser.
Other review i saw some guys are mentioned volume problem  i used this phone more than 24 hours really superb volume.
 Hi guys i m going to write a complete review for those people who r really confused to buy mobile
 the mobile is nice compared to 10k range and camera quality is also good   better than k3 note and other fones  if u like it thn go for it but before buying go for full review in youtube 
Its totally an unbiased review.
--------------------------------------------------------
thanks  1
free thanks to a light camera app  and focusing is really fast and smooth.
Performance is smooth  thanks for 2GB RAM and Intel processor.
 The phone is really Nice and thanks to flipkart for delivering the product before or I would like to say much earlier than the date of delivery.
At last thanks to Flipkat for their service.
And at last but not least thanks to flipkart for delivering my first smartphone before the expected delivery date.
performance is good thanks to Zenui and 2gb ram.
 Thanks filpkart in 9000 you cant get better than this.
--------------------------------------------------------
auto brightness sensor  -1
versa which made me assume that my sensor was defective.
I am not happy with the auto brightness sensor.
from the day 1 I seriosuly hvnt noticed any issue regarding proximity sensor even i hv used a tempered glass also so may be you got the device defected  P NO OFFENCE
I do have a DSLR and I do understand the short comings of all small sensor cameras.
Actually there was no hole where sensor is available.
I had bought Lenove K3 note  but after 1 week one day phone got heated so much and touch sensor on some parts of screen started giving problem.
 Received a defective handset that had an issue with the proximity sensor  even though the remote testing done by flipkart found the sensor to be present.
Ans  If you think you need a phone which provide DSLR quality image  buy a camera not a phone with small sensor for taking decent photographs.
Ans  My phone is good  and its Proximity sensor works fine.
sensor also works fine.
--------------------------------------------------------
2 gb ram  -1
2 GB ram is good enough.
2gb ram is given but on average 500mb remains free on normal use .
camera quality is good but it should have been 32 GB internal  
4  2 gb ram is good.
and now  1 gb RAM is always free.
9  1GB free RAM is enough for multi tasking   10 GB usable internal storage is enough for storing many high end games or large applications.
Free RAM should have been more considering 2 GB RAM in specification sheet.
You will never be able to free up more than 1 GB ram on this device .
2gb ram makes it fast and lag free.
2 Gb Ram is good to have these days.
but 2gb version maybe u need more RAM in future so of ur a heavy game user go for 3gb version 
which is good for my purpose  2 GB RAM .
1 GB Ram is always free .
Some guys expect full 2 GB RAM   16 GB internal storage available but that s practically impossible.
I am not going to talk of some features like 2 GB RAM  as it works great in multitaksing  and in heavy games apps  Sound Quality  as it is simply good and do the task without any problem  16 GB internal memory  as you get sufficient for your images and apps .
But system needs 1 gb ram for its own  only 3 to 4 hundred mb ram will remain  i have moto g2 it has i gb ram  but still get 3 to 4 hundred mb ram free ram  overall good product  accessories are not available in the market  
Sufficient RAM of 2 GB.
5 storage  out of 16gb 10 gb is available and with sd card it is expandable upto 128gb
1GB free RAM space without any installation of apps  though you can block unwanted apps by clicking auto start manager which is the best i say  got 2 updates with in a week  one z of 540 mb and 430 mb wich are helpful and added more features like laser scale and additional power saving modes  phone doesn t heat at all even playing games like temple run subway surf.
On first boot I get 1GB of free RAM  but in K3 note you get 600.
800 MB to 1 GB RAM free after installing some applications like
Plenty of free ram  1 GB on boot .
--------------------------------------------------------
worth  -1
Overall worth of buying.
--------------------------------------------------------
4 gorilla glass  -1
 With gorilla glass 4 you are safe and with 3000mah battery is huge for a day 
Screen looks great with corning gorilla protection.
Be careful at while putting a tempered glass screen guard.
Gorilla glass 4 is great
Touch Pad with gorilla glass 4 is unbelievable.
5 the quality of gorilla glass is very poor.
It runs smoothly and battery back is good and if you put tempered glass  then sensor is not working   screen is black during calls so you need to remove tempered glass.
i hav applied glass screen gard of asus zenfone 2  purchased from local market  perfectly fits the screen and no issue of proximity sensor.
It came with the Latest Gorilla Glass 4 which is the strongest Glass.
--------------------------------------------------------
i. e.  -1
on each phone i. e. less than a week since my purchase.
--------------------------------------------------------
update  -1
after new update from asus .
But the latest update for the camera is worst it domn my camera clarity.
Will provide further update.
The camera  OMG  after the last update  it got even better  the clarity  the quality  the selfies  the videos.
Only concern is frequent update is need.
but after the latest update came  1.
Recent Update I cannot cut the call seriously  This is worst phone turns dark and you will not be able to cut the call.
Call Drop issue has been detected after a recent update for which I had to restart my phone most of the times.
Camera is good but in future update it may get more improved.
But the most disappointing feature is that after the first update that I got  the sound through headphones is not so good in terms of BASS  even though using AUDIO WIZARD but sound is very loud and clear.
--------------------------------------------------------
auto start manager  1
ASUS ZenUI provides many built in apps  like Auto Start Manager  which helps prevent auto.
--------------------------------------------------------
asus zenfone laser  -1
But then i have seen a lot of review videos and finally came to the conclusion that Asus zenfone 2 laser is the Best of all.
as other asus zenfones it also comes with a awesome ZENUI which is the best part of every zenfones.
But overall Asus Zenfone 2 Laser is the best phone in the sub 10k budget  its better than other phone in this price range like Xiomi Note 4G  Yu Yureka Plus  Lenovo K3 Note   Moto G. this is the best phone at10k budget.
I have Three No s of this Asus Zenfone laser 550KL mobile working good compare to Asus old models
ASUS ZenFone wonderful product and clipart delivers it nicely 
Overall  ASUS ZENFONE 2 LASER is currently the best sub 10k phone.
Got my new Asus Zenfone 2 Laser.
After using asus zenfone for last 3 days i observed that phone performance is very good.
The several ASUS apps within the zenfone that connect you to other people actually connect you only to other zenfone users.
Over all Asus zenfone 2 laser is Good.
I Have suggested to my mobile asus zenfone 2 laser ZE550KL is not working SIM 2 Slot.
My experience with Asus Zenfone2 Laser is great because it s the only phone available in market which fulfills all my requirements.
Sorry ASUS  Waited a long time for the zenfone only to be gravely disappointed.
--------------------------------------------------------
great  1
Great sleek look
--------------------------------------------------------
for price range  1
A good phone for best price  good battery  good in camera quality under this price range.
 A phone for this price range is ecstatic  I m in love with this phone  no lag  great UI thanks to Asus ZenUI  build quality is amazing  Flipkart delivered it on time  Coming to pro   cons   
The looks  Camera  UI  Ram Or gaming performance is quite decent and really great for its price range.
 Overall performance is good compare to other phones in the same range Price .